But for now it's time to welcome this week's Top Chef, Lynnette Kaufmann! We asked her a few questions to learn a little more about her:
Wearing the blue work overalls symbolic of slaves and laborers,
Tracking your Photos. When saving your photos, come up with an easy to remember filing system to quickly find and differentiate both your original images and your edits. It's a sinking feeling when you realize you've just saved your only copy of your original photo as a 100 x 100dpi thumbnail.
One thing I have learned, is that if you are running an organization who's success depends on cooperation with your municipal government, it is probably not a good idea to bash them in the media, whether you feel it is warranted or not!
“Did you hit the panic button?” I ask.
Funding: 100-percent funded with federal money. Paid for with ARRA funds via the Federal Railroad Administration High-Speed Intercity Passenger Rail Program. Funds directed to the Michigan Department of Transportation for the City of Dearborn’s Intermodal Passenger Rail Station.
Despite my excitement to move to a nice, simple and serene home where the toilet always flushes easily (unlike my house), I still have small panic attacks that come with change. As my readers know, I am always one to push “jumping off” but I think perhaps my unease came from the fact that this was a decision made FOR me, not one of leisurely circumstance. I lay awake all Saturday night after touring the house, tossing and turning. Finally at 6am, I got up and went to breakfast to seek some council from my father. I questioned everything I could, most notably having my daughter change schools at 14.
AND OH MY GOD! FINNICK! I LOVE HIM SO MUCH! not as much as I love Peeta but really close. Who are they going to cast as Finnick? aaahhh…
As Trixie proceeds to humiliate the characters in Ponyville, it’s clear that the necessary response to Trixie is to whip out proper magic and put her in her place; it’s established consistently that Trixie’s magic is nowhere as powerful as Twilight’s. Instead, Twilight backs away in discouragement. The problem with secularism is that even as it separates the religious life from the communal life, it forces the religious person to experience a shared identity with the dark side of religiosity. Outwardly lived, the contrasts are open to exposure, criticism, and analysis. Inwardly lived, we may disagree but we fail to confront those problems, where they fester instead of heal.
Then she ladled the coffee out and placed it in a bowl. Turning to her
Welcome back…
All in all, it's shaping up to be a busy summer. Lots of gardening, farming, and projects in the works, which I'll detail here soon. Love and miss you all!
For this week’s “Scam Watch” feature. I thought I would tell you a little about the Internet service called JustAnswer.com
I started with mini-stories, and the first one I ever completed was 20 pages (if I recall correctly) with 20 font. It was HORRIBLE. Then we have the stories worked on with a friend of mine, involving many made-up creatures. Those, too, were in my opinion not worthy of mention. Now we zoom over a gray area of which I forget what happened in my writing life, and over to Outcasts. Skip that chunk of time, and we come to SOF.
5 cloves
But whatever it looks like, it is sure to go great with her helmet.
Under Chris’s contract, we are ineligible for Germany’s public health plan. Friends of mine who have it seem to be very pleased with the care they get for the cost. We had to find our own insurance when we arrived.
When I was finally allowed the privilege of joining a crew on a patrol van, my new mentor, crew-member and driver, was a middle-aged Coloured man by the name of Sergeant Schoeman. He was a sturdy robust man with a joyful pleasant attitude. His huge build and his broad moustache, which he loved twisting upwards at both ends, gave him that typical authoritative military appearance. I have many pleasant memories about this man and can recall how thankful I was, on several occasions, that I had him as crew-member on patrol.
II. handful of moss (kinda messy)
You cannot force salvation upon a person; it would not be genuine faith. Our unsaved husbands must come to the Spirit-led decision to convert through the divine guidance and intervention of our Lord. So persevere in your prayers and be watchful of your words and actions. Remember what the Bible says about wives being able to usher along their husband's acceptance of the faith through her kind, soft words and actions. Persevere, ladies. Persevere in prayer and through strength in the Holy Spirit. I can only imagine how difficult and frustrating it can be, but God blesses our faithfulness.
Thanks to my friend Stephanie (Cre8tive Designs, Inc.) and her Pinterest board, I found a lovely velvety grey-blue Target settee with nailhead detailing for under $300. Although I originally thought it would be perfect in our entryway, for now it's made a home under the stairs, an area of our home that was previously barren.
But why be so negative you might ask? Here are a few things Obama did manage to do. He extended unemployment benefits because they’re no jobs as his stimulus package was too small. He also managed to cut payroll taxes, which is a back door way to defund Social Security, He helped cover up the BP oil spill in the Gulf by allowing Corexit, a toxic disbursement not allowed in other countries, to break up the oil which then dropped to the bottom instead of just cleaning it up. In other words, allowing them to hide the body.
Awhile back before I got pregnant, Jeff and I found ourselves with a lazy weekend afternoon. We put our heads together and decided on three goals: get high, have sex, and cut Jeff's hair.
i did make her laugh again which is all i needed.
Frankie continued. "And the stigmata. What was the point of that?"
The long-term diversity of life in the sea depends on the sea-level set by plate tectonics and the local supernova rate set by the astrophysics, and on virtually nothing else.
For single Catholic men between 18 and 35 years of age (under 18 please contact us).
Yes, these are stiffened. Don't look too closely because I do need to clean up the extra glue. They keep their shape, but can be reshaped some after the balloon is popped. I need to make or find some small boxes to give/store these in so that they will keep their shape. A word of warning, 2 year old daughters love to play with these items and can make it so they don't look like a ball anymore!
174And here, ev'n then, shall my cold dust remain,
And cheap too.
Sleep? I am really stressing over sleep positions. When I asked my doctor she said really any position but flat on your back is ok. Well every time I wake up in the middle of the night I am on my back...how do I fix that ?!?
So anyway... Here is the Lucky in Love Onesie Tute! Enjoy!
In the future, humanity has extended its reach to space, establishing colonies in fixed positions between the Earth and Moon. Though striving to live in peace, the colonies find themselves under the oppression of the wary United Earth Sphere Alliance, headquartered on mankind’s home planet. Hiiro Yui, a charismatic figure in colonial society, begins to rally the colonies together under a banner of pacifism and peaceful resolution, but is assassinated; the Alliance is considered accountable. Years later, a strange Mobile Suit appears in Earth’s skies, composed of the rare element, Gundanium. The Organization of the Zodiac (OZ), an elite branch of the Alliance military, intercepts the suit on its descent to Earth. Unable to destroy the target, but managing to force a crash landing in the ocean, OZ retreats, leaving the Gundam pilot, a teenage boy named Hiiro Yui, to his fate.
The article notes very well that many EDL members have nothing in common with the tea-partyists and are to the left on the political spectrum. It then mentions atheist leftists and liberals. I'd say around half of the EDL are atheist, judging by the comments on the forum. The tea-party have very much a Christian core, with many members quite fundamentalist. Some within even believe the theory that it wasn't a bunch of fundamental Muslims that attacked on 9/11, but was some conspiracy between US neo-cons and Israeli intelligence!
There are almost 400 emails in the pen. Even if I did four a day, every day, for three months, I'd still be behind. Look at the dates on the posts and it's more like four a week.
Programme organizers say children best develop cognitive skills when taught in the language spoken in the home during their first years of school, rather than in official national languages – Tetum and Portuguese in the case of Timor-Leste – which are less commonly used in community settings.
Presently, deliveries are done once a week to Sections 5, 6, 7, 8, 17 in PJ, Bandar Utama, Taman Tun Dr. Ismail, Bangsar and Damansara Heights area in Kuala Lumpur.
Nevertheless, the truth is that both sides haven’t moved away from the center. Only Republicans have, and Democrats have spent the past 20 years chasing them in hopes that eventually they could reach some kind of reconciliation. But it never did any good. The Democratic move rightward was interpreted not as a bid for compromise somewhere in the middle, but as a victory for a resurgent conservative movement that merely inspired them to move the goalposts even further out.
You are not among your friends any longer! You will not enjoy having us among you!
Imaginary Girls by Nova Ren Suma
What projects are you currently working on?
I won't make that mistake again.
I think that GLBC really comes through on this brew and if you haven't given it a try yet, I would recommend that you do.
Puget Sound Completes Public Offering Of $250 Million 25
When he was here a couple of weeks ago he crawled into my center hallway and step by step (with nonnie’s hands never more than a few inches from his butt) he crawled up all 15 steps to the second floor. I had bellowed for his parents, Dan, and his great grandparents to watch him ascend the steps for the first time, fearless and proud of his accomplishment.
“It was so refreshing talking about nature and the countryside while sitting and cuddling on hay bales, rather than discussing something vacuous about work in a noisy city bar or club.”
the tide would knock it down.
Dustin knows ALL of the good stuff! He says that the Parkville Brewfest is coming up, that he's been to it in the last few years and that its a good time.
8 The BBC on Saudi Arabia’s huge budget surplus. Saudi Arabia has posted an $81.6bn budget surplus for 2011 as its income beat forecasts by more than double, official figures suggest. Revenues grew to $296bn, although ministers had forecast $144bn, said the Saudi Arabian finance ministry. The country plans to reduce spending in 2012 to $184bn after officials said they expect the surplus fall to just $3bn next year. Analysts however, see this as another conservative forecast. Most of the growth in revenue was driven by oil production which accounts for around 90% of the country’s exports.
seeking for a wish in the pocket of life.
I was home about four and realized I had not thought of dinner at all, we made an executive decision and went for the first summer BBQ.
Triumph, as an affirmative defense, pleaded that its marks have acquired distinctiveness, based mostly on "substantial" revenues ("seven figures") and distribution of four million promotional pieces in 2008. The Board deemed COACH to be "not so highly descriptive that Applicant has the burden to show a concomitantly high level of acquired distinctiveness." Opposer argued that the only evidence of acquired distinctiveness was the testimony of Triumph's own witness, which was "self-serving and uncorroborated." The Board, however, noted that the witness was rigorously cross-examined and that her testimony was credible.
Whisk together powdered sugar, water, and extract; drizzle over warm shortbread. Cut each strip diagonally into 1-inch slices. Cool in pans on wire racks.
Will you remember me?
sliced coconut pieces (thenga kothu) -1/4 cup
God took the strength of a mountain,
Keep your mind & heart in preparation
Man, this book was a rollercoaster ride of excitement and amazingness.
We all want to rant and rave and use statistics against the traditional publishing beast as we know it, but kicking it from one end of the street to the other might give us a temporary sense of empowerment and vent our frustrations against the gatekeepers of the beast, but whether we like it or not, we are only going to fix publishing by becoming a part of it. It is time we forgot about the cosmetics of labels like ‘indie’ and championing personal platforms and commercial interests. If ASI really wants to do something constructive, then they should look to fully empowering their authors to do what Seth Godin and Joe Konrath do – let your authors take full control – provide them with a service that makes them own their ISBN and imprint name. Provide them with real distribution channels to high street bookstores. Strike a deal that offers your publishing engine to one of the big six publishing houses. And for the love of god, drop the ‘Achieve your dreams’ talk. I’d like to think that kind of sell is something for the true vanity presses.
"No," she pleads, "I didn't mean it, please don't do this to me."
About: The first amateur script to ever crack The Scriptshadow Top 10. Tyler was an unsold unrepped writer out of Brooklyn when he sent this to me. After I sent the script out to half a dozen industry contacts on Wednesday, the script has found its way into every agency, management company, and studio in town. Late yesterday, Tyler finally made his decision to go with WME, who will put a package together for the project and go out with it in the near future.
I have then gone in and randomly added some B37
Dessert #2 was the "Brownette," scratch-made, chewy but not dense, and neither overpoweringly sweet nor overpoweringly chocolate-y. Good stuff. Elle's hoarding hers . . . maybe for breakfast tomorrow. Unless Umami gets to them tonight . . . now, where are those buggers . . .
I have unspecific recollections that other people I've listened to have said this before, but ... for purely commercial cinema, 2010's Morning Glory is shockingly decent. Not "subversive"; nothing "smuggled": it's simply a product with narrative content that is honest and expressive in contrast to most Hollywood releases: there's a faint trace of 1930s-40s classical Hollywood in this movie. (Perhaps it's because it depicts a world of busy invention and constant improvisation, not unlike the production plants of classical Hollywood themselves.) Rachel McAdams plays a 28-year-old morning show producer, Becky Fuller, who loses her job in New Jersey. She gets a shot at a low-rated morning show in New York at the station IBS. There, she is soon expected to raise flagging ratings considerably if she wants to keep her job and to keep the show on air.
Well I am pleased to report that my first birthday overseas was the best birthday EVER!
The people in Crapstone have not had similar problems, although their sign is periodically stolen by word-loving merrymakers. And their village became a stock joke a few years ago, when a television ad featuring a prone-to-swearing soccer player named Vinnie Jones showed Mr. Jones’s car breaking down just under the Crapstone sign.
In addition to the lavender gardens, the also have a quaint little shop and coffee house where you can purchase a light snack and lavender based products. A few of the products include strawberry lavender syrup, strawberry lavender jelly (a favourite of mine on fresh croissants!), lavender sea salt, lavender coffee and tea (you see the theme here?). In addition to the food items they also had a variety of bath and body products and even some lavender scented shampoo for your canine buds!
The apostle addresses their immaturity at first,
that was sweet;
Cumin powder 1tsp
“I will give them a heart to know Me.” Jeremiah 24:7
No, Mr Young is a lover of all things that can be classified as household, stationery or electronic. So, a trip to Asda for a new iron means that he is chomping at the bit to rush off and spend a happy hour or so with me, inspecting all the towels, cushions, candles, tupperware and tin openers.
Because at that time ….
Both paintings will be scanned shortly and made available as prints.
Today the weather is better. The winds have died down and the sky is blue but it's still bitter cold outside. We have electricity today - but it's so weak that the heaters aren't heating and the microwave oven isn't microwaving. I'm wearing a sweater over my pajamas and thick socks with my Crocs. I look hideous, but warm. It's supposed to be cold for the next few days.
Another obvious difference is that most of the pieces are much shorter. I won’t say too much more about that here, as I know you’ve got a specific question about flash fiction coming up later!
And as far as seeing that Jet fly over my
Back to James, he then got the help he wanted to in Wade and Bosh. And he was a beast when eliminating Celtics and Bulls in the Eastern Conference Playoffs. But when the time came to face against one of the most experienced defensive point guard in the league in Kidd, he failed to deliver. The beast turned into the beauty as he could only manage as low as 8 points in Game 4 in a perfectly healthy condition. James definitely is not as versatile as Johnson was. Whilst at the same time Nowitzki scored 21 points to lead the Mavs tied up the series with torn tendon left fingers and 38 degrees Celsius sinus infection fever.
“Indeed I do. That sword was one of my father’s last creations. He made it for Jetrune as a decoration to hang in his great hall.” I replied.
Kalinda
7-8 cloves of garlic. 3-4 for each. Slivered or sliced. No mincing here, please
Imagine Shoji Hamada in Abergavenny.
I will also teach my son that Bill Dunn could have resulted from the slime crawling out of the ocean OR maybe, just maybe he formed from a giant turdball. My gut tells me to go with the latter theory, and I have the evidence to back it up since he is the Turd of the Week™.
But what about foods I have never tried before?
The most obvious of these details is Pathologic’s colour palette, a thin wash of lifeless browns and grays. The most subversive of the details is the music, a relentless, natural-industrial track which never stops breathing down your neck and changes from area to area. The most effective of these details is the children. Pathologic’s intro cinematic is three kids holding a mock funeral for a tattered stuffed animal. It’s got nothing to do with anything, but it does kind of set the tone for the whole game. The children of Pathologic are everywhere, and, as I mentioned above, they’re largely abandoned.
This city desert makes you feel so cold
That was a knife to my heart. I felt that I had failed her, because it had been on my mind to do for quite some time (clearly for a reason). I just did not think she would need it yet. Then I remembered some of what I experienced in high school. I remembered the situations I was in, and how mean others could be. I realized that I, too, could have used this advice at that time in my life. So, with that said, I am finally getting around to doing what I should have done months and months ago.
Happy Birthday Ashley!
July 17, 2011 — Casey Anthony is released from jail at 12:10 AM, with $537.68 in cash.
Mr Brons is currently embroiled in a bitter dispute with Mr Griffin after he contested the leadership of the party last May.
With the many payasam I seem to have ended making, I might as well had planned for a Payasam Variety as theme. I didn't strike me at all, only while I was editing the pictures did it strike me of a missed BM theme. These days anything I do, is done with the BM in mind. So much so that even Amma has started thinking that way.
The rules are simple. Two days to vote in each single elimination round. The beers have been paired randomly, vote for your favorite in the column to the right.
Old people are cool. My grandpa was born and raised in the south, and was a sailor in the war, and pretty much has a vocabulary to match it. But when you get to that age, you pretty much are aloud to say whatever you want and get away with it. Which is like me on the internet.
The thing in Mog that is shared by the other two books is that there is, yet again, another home invasion. Funny. In The Borrower's, Arriety and her family were the invaders. In Little Miss Suzy, it was those scary gang squirrels. And in Mog, it was a nighttime burglar who broke in to steal the family's valuable silverware. Interesting similarities, now that I've noticed that.
And last but not least, the sermon was ended with a reminder of the Good News of the Gospel… It certainly is wonderful news that Christ was raised from the dead, and that He is risen today. And if we have been saved and can testify to His death and resurrection, how can we stay comfortable in our Christian security? This is definitely a call for us to go to unbelievers with the Gospel, because eternity is at stake.
The civil war in Mexico is a more serious threat to the security of the United states that the civil war in Afghanistan. Because in Afghanistan the American military industry complex earns billions of dollars, with hardly any soldiers dying.
86. Jumper: Steven C. Gould
Feds slam Texas factory over discrimination claims
It is not that ten-year-olds don’t have better natures; they do, but they are also in the process of moral development and are subject to many other powerful motivations, one of the strongest being peer pressure. Add to this the fact that children from a very young age have a finely developed sense of the security with which adults perceive their own authority and you can understand why Thomas Mooney never had a chance with us.
A: Yes. But it is DRM-free, so it can be easily ported to any format.
If this turns out as my predictability tells, I can see our team going to the playoff without a problem, and even making it past the first round or two. I’m not going to say Playoff champions, but we should make it far.
In it, there is a cop with the Canton, Ohio Police Department who comes up behind a car legally parked on the street, orders an occupant out, and immediately begins disparaging the man. Doesn't matter to me that the cops are white and the two people the main meathead cop hassles are black.
My next card features a cute release image from the January Club Kit. her princess party dress was painted with sparkle shimmer spray for a wonderful all-over shine. the same spray was used on the rose. papers are Authentique Freebird Nest Delight. the tag was sprayed with pink cadillac glimmer mist for additional shine on the card. pretty pink everywhere! :) buttons are all vintage.
So instead I will go to bed at 9pm all this week wake up and drink decaf and try not too eat too many birthday cupcakes my son will make with love and probably some snot. Ain't aging grand.
Prepration:
accidentally ruined a girls brand new white blouse on her birthday…in the cafeteria. I had a knack for making friends. Oh and if you're lucky I'll tell you how I spilled red jello in my crotch at lunch and trust me when I say, it stained and did not go un-noticed the remainder of the day.
Down one of the corridors stood a beautiful woman, sheltering some children. I knew her. In a world of sepia-toned shadows, her face glowed brilliantly with calm and sweetness. She had long curly hair down to her shoulders.
"Never. All those years of practice, that's why I always win." Frankie raised the cup to his lips, and before drinking, he shook his head and added, "Silly Americans. Part-time Catholics indeed. What was it that you once wrote - there is no such thing as partial faith - there is either total faith or no faith?"
So those are just a few things I have learned during my training. I had know I’ve learned more but these are the things that keep cropping up. What did you learn when exploring birth and pregnancy? Was it reassuring or scary? Did you find consistency or was it constant contradiction like co-sleeping?
Welcome to my room .
“Is the sad lady going away?” Kathy looked at Mattie whose eyes were beginning to close. The smell of Christmas perfume spreading across the bus.
disease instead of a lover.
If any of the “vitals” are outside of the normal parameters, it may be an indication that your body is not as healthy as it could be.
6/5 – Los Angeles, CA @ Echoplex
Not only are her designs gorgeous, sophisticated and sexy, but the salmon-pink velvet backdrop and the lights frame the models perfectly.
1 sm box Coconut Cream Pudding
It is of course not the only instance of vandalism by such groups. A church sign in Hickory, NC was defaced earlier in the week:
Sweet Baby is a stamp from Fiskars cut on a 1" circle
As I look forward to becoming a mother...hopefully sooner than later...I am reminded of all the wonderful role models I have in my life. Women who modeled, and continue to model, the mother that God wants us to be. One of those women is my own mother.
I also want to mention the opening act, Graffiti 6. I had never heard them before (my kids had) although I had heard of them, and I absolutely fell in love. The lead singer’s voice had such wonderful purity and clarity, and his falsetto was amazing. The group’s harmonies was beautiful, and their songs were addictive and fun. My daughter bought the CD and got the lead singer’s autograph in the break between sets. And as she confirmed after she met him, “He’s British, which just automatically makes him cooler.”
Just go out and do what makes your heart happy.
And since he has nursed me back to health, and since I just enjoyed a fabulous Mexican vacation, I say "Bring on the Coconut(s)"
*my bad
“The U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission said in a court filing that the amount of fines and disgorgement will be decided later against Madoff, the former Nasdaq stock market chairman whose assets were temporarily frozen by court order two months ago.” The report said.
I would say, second, that we have a real obligation to recognize that, if you’re truly faithful, it’s not just an hour on Sundays or Saturdays or Fridays. It’s in fact something that should suffuse your life, to be a part of who you are. And in that sense, it is inextricably tied in with how you behave.
ENQUIRER. This is very interesting. Tell me, have the Adepts thus inspired or dictated to many of your Theosophists?
She did a lovely drawing tonight, this is the “baddie” from Monsters vs Aliens – her favourite film at the moment:
I worry that someday all his struggles with sensory stimuli, learning and just daily living will prove to be too much for him, that he'll just want to give up on it all, because life is just so damn hard for him.
Until 4 excruciating months ago
8. Spring Is Here
Today bump and I went for a 5k walk. No speed records for sure but it was good for my head, and my heart, and my body. It gave me focus. So my new plan is to walk. 5 km a day (unless my body tells me otherwise) and do extra training only if I feel like it. But walking will be my baseline, keep the exercise habit going, and remind me that this is who I am. Someone who trains no matter what.
The MCA, a founding member party of BN, went into convulsions of in-fighting, with its top leaders displaying insatiable hunger for power and myopic vindictiveness.
2) the extended family.
Purina 1 ONE Dry Cat Food & 2 3oz Cans ONE Wet Food $1/both
We're learning a lot about one another, such as:
Chocolate covered peeps y'all.
in her midnight sky.
Advantage 2: Christian youth will develop resilience and a better Christian witness. If anything, the public school system will offer challenges that will either make or break their faith. These challenges are healthy, and as we’ve learned with many of our Christian education paradigms, you can’t substitute struggle and actual growth. The public school system will challenge your children’s faith and present opportunities to share the gospel and see the power of the Spirit to guard and protect His own, creating a genuine faith.
momo-darlin
I won the Scrap 365 sketch challenge with my layout of beardy Phil. I'm slightly stunned because some of those other entries just blew me away with their fabulousness. SO thanks for picking me judges - most appreciated.
Which is more than can be said for the rest of this group....There may be veteran actors here and there, and certainly Malia Nurmi (aka: Vampira) has a ghoulish-enough look to her, but the amount of bad line reads, clumsy oafs stumbling over the set pieces and awkward stances make Plan 9 more of a filmed cold run-through of the script on the first day before shooting.
Thanks for being here and reading :)
That’s pretty simple. Don’t yell at me, especially if I did nothing to deserve it.
Kevin P. Connors, 55, Greenwich, Conn.
But I’ve run into two problems, both of which (I imagine) are temporary. The first one is me being uncomfortable with change. For anyone who’s been following this blog for any amount of time, you’ll know that I seem to be inconsistent. Or rather, in my own head I feel that I am. I absolutely hate change with a fiery, burning passion. I feel like I must be faintly autistic (and it would absolutely not surprise me to learn if I had Asperger’s), because from what I know of friends and family with autistic tendencies or diagnoses, change is a really hard thing for them to swallow. The older of my two brothers is one of these people, and he definitely is still having a difficult time with my impending transition. Like I’m not…
Where the film really works is in the contributions from some actual beer tickers. These people are portrayed sympathetically and the impression you get is one of a decent bunch of chaps with an unusual but entirely harmless hobby. Phil falls in love with his topic and rather than maintain an objective distance from it, he wholeheartedly engages in it. This results in a fair insight into the hobby including the rules that you have to neck a half before it’s a tick and the peculiar activity of bottling. This involves pouring your half into an empty 250ml panda pops bottle to tick later in the event of their being more that needs ticking than you are able to do. I mean I’m no expert but that can’t be a way to actually enjoy the beer, can it? Necking old stale beer from panda pops bottles? We are informed by a chap called Gazza Prescott that “scoopers” appreciate the beer and tickers just need to tick it off.
We've been battling diaper rash, and eczema. It's awful. :( Your poor skin is so dry and itchy and you have scratches all over. We're switching to Dove sensitive soap, Eucerin lotion and Free & Clear detergent. I hope it helps my sweet boy, I hate seeing you suffer.
However I still found myself taking the side of the Main family, just as I did 20 years ago… Something about lost causes I guess.
From the number of church-related posts on "By Stargoose And Hanglands" you might get the idea that I'm a person of deep religious conviction. Nothing could be further from the truth. But I find the buildings - their architecture, history and spirit - endlessly fascinating. Although they stand as monuments to continuity through the ages they are constantly changing. In my local church some of the evidence for this has been documented by the Meldreth Local History Group whose website is full of interesting information about the village.
We look forward to seeing how this newly-available species does in our yard. We'll watch it to be sure it doesn't become invasive, and if it can stand the summer heat and humidity. For now, it's obvious that Wendy's Wish loves spring in Central Florida just as much as we do!
2 cans diced green chiles
They embodied, across my off-white walls, fictions.
I'm happy to say this quilt has been claimed by my 5 year old son (yes, the same one who declared last week he didn't want a quilt). Despite the pink in it, he loves the spiral pattern and has spent this afternoon snuggled under it :oD
Place them on a baking sheet and cook for 20 minutes at 180c
Southwest-chic via prints and/or accessories
No news: it is not clear why NAMA sold the property at this time and didn’t wait for a recovery in prices. Given that the IMF was urging the agency to dispose of assets sooner rather than later and with rumours of an IMF staff member permanently occupying a desk in NAMA’s offices at Treasury Building, perhaps the final decision to sell was not NAMA’s to make…
Native Instruments have once again come up with another classic library for your KORE player.
The color is where I'm disappointed. I was under the impression that these were true neons. I know Skinny Dip isn't going to be, but I really expected that Beach Cruiser was. It's a very bright hot pink/fuchsia-ish color that's a little darker than I expected. But I'm really not seeing neon. It kinda borders between a neon and bright, but unfortunately, I just don't think it's a true neon. The other thing that gives me a hunch that it's not a true neon is it doesn't have that satin, semi-matte finish that is a trademark of a neon. I did a swatch on my nail wheel because I always top coat my polish anyway, and it looks quite shiny even without a top coat. When I picture summer neons, I picture China Glaze's Poolside collection. And don't get me wrong, this is still a BRIGHT color. I'm just still not convinced it's a neon. And also don't think that I don't like this polish. I still think it's a beautiful color. I just really expected more of a real neon.
He's 6'4" and, though skinny as the proverbial rake, you wouldn't want to mess with him. (Which is actually an illusion - he's a pussy cat. Whereas I may be a foot shorter but am far more scary!)
But, for the moment, Linda isn't anxious for the day to begin. It is comfortable just resting here in the early morning light.
I spent the day roaming the city. I wanted to see the best and worst of what it had to offer and was pleased all around. My hostel is within walking distance of the subway and three quick avenues later I found myself on the elevated tracks of the red line heading to Rajiv Chowk with a transfer at Kashmiri Gate. As a New Yorker, I love a good subway, and Delhi’s system makes me feel at home. The cars are well-lit and air conditioned and the tracks have signs telling you when the next train is arriving and where the doors will stop. Announcements are made in Hindi and English and even during rush hour the train feels comfortable.
Display:
Think also of the thief on the cross. He acknowledged that he and the other thief were getting what they deserved. They had committed crimes, their lives were literally over, wasted, finished. But in turning to Jesus and asking to be remembered, even at that late hour, the full stop in his life became a new and amazing story: “I tell you the truth. Today you will be with me in paradise.”
Like my home state of Oregon, Washington is quickly growing in the Wine making industry, and is now second only to California in terms of US Production.
- Focus on laws and order rather than relationship.
A few examples: By the beginning of the 20th century, all the various schools of modern art dissolved into what can only be called a “lawless” state: Cubism, Futurism, ending in just blocks on the canvas – or, what Jackson Pollock was doing twenty-five years ago: standing in the midst of a large canvas, he would get “inspired,” dip his paint brushes in pails, and throw the paint (and sometimes whatever came into his hands) on the canvas. You cannot seriously call it art if you consider what the ancient masters created was art, because they were meticulous and careful and there was a whole art or science to what they did.
Nor does my hair look very good on Skype.
Steve: "Hello"
Then a few minutes later, while others are commenting nice things about the photo, you step back into your reality..
The young lady is a very devout Lutheran Christian, and wants to go to Bible college and enter the ministry. She has undoubtedly touched many lives for the better, and will touch even more.
Happy National Scrapbooking Day! I think it has spread across the globe so wherever you are- do something crafty today!
Due to lack of labeling, many Americans are still unfamiliar with what genetically engineered foods are. We have a plan to change that, and I urge you to participate and to continue learning more about genetically engineered foods and helping your friends and family do the same.
 Easily receive God’s love and His characters and easily follow God’s command
Fast forward to the summer of 2004. Pete had taken the boys on one of their annual baseball road trips which brought them to Chicago. They made a stop to see some of my relatives and had a BBQ dinner with my cousin Cindy, her husband John and my Aunt Nancy and Uncle Bruce.
= filler cost+tax
The only reason I'm selling an autograph of the greatest receiver of all time, is because I have two other autographs of him (one on a mini helmet with Joe Montana, and one in person on my Hall of Fame Football). Card looks a lot better than the scans shows.
As I was browsing through blogville and all things internet, I started seeing all sorts of ideas and menus. I had all sorts of ideas milling about in my head (some of them were even good ones). Oscar night is a star studded event so I was thinking about making something that was also star studded. Star studded with bacon of course!
I have a few weeks/months to go but I am starting to be able to do more. My wrist has healed, and I am using it quite fully and fairly normally. My ankle is still healing in some ways, yet is sturdy enough to be receiving my weight so yesterday I began taking first steps, and know that this will progress, too, in time, so that I can eventually be up and walking normally again. I thank God for this hope and for his healing, and how he has made our bodies to heal from severe trauma.
But now, this is what the Lord says — he who created you, O Jacob, he who formed you, O Israel: “Fear not, for I have redeemed you; I have summoned you by name; you are mine. When you pass through the waters, I will be with you; and when you pass through the rivers, they will not sweep over you. When you walk through the fire, you will not be burned; the flames will not set you ablaze. For I am the Lord, your God, the Holy One of Israel, your Savior …” NIV
EXTERIOR: BREWOOINE -- DUNES.
vodka eyeballing craze that started in the U.S. and has now spread to the university party scene in Britain
I pull some slime from me hair. I feel like such an idiot! Look at the state of me! How can I hold any kind of conversation together when I look like this?! I try to compose meself and to say something vaguely normal! "So what were you doing down this way then? Didn't know that you came to this park?"
“I am deeply grateful for the increase in giving, some $7.6 million above the 2008 Lottie Moon Christmas Offering, and for the sacrifice made by Southern Baptists during these difficult economic times.”
*You MUST face the attacking dog! Turn your body towards it but don't look at it. (This goes against our instincts, but it must be done.)
Technical assistance
I've been applying in the morning and evening and have been itching much less and the red patches on my legs have started to go down. Behind my knees gets particularly bad at this time of year and I spend half my day itching them through my jeans - so far I've been resisting that urge and in fact haven't thought about it. It's suitable for toddlers and children and is non-greasy and easily absorbed.
What happened to me today.
Friends, if you put in all the hard work to run a half-marathon, don't something stupid like waste some of that hard work over something silly like a poorly tied shoe. It points to a pretty serious lack of concentration in my pre-race preparation, where you are supposed to check things like how your feet feel in their shoes. Unbelievable.
Monster Truck Wedding: More and more women are getting involved with monster trucks. Could you imagine showing up to your wedding in a huge monster truck? If so, this may be a great theme for you. Little monster trucks easily found in the toy section of any store could be used as wedding decorations or favors.
I woke up the morning of our lunch and pondered over what to wear. Unfortunatel, my clothes all belonged to my previous geek self, not the Super Cool Writer I was about to become. Still, I managed to select an outfit, and carefully elected to eat cereal for breakfast so nothing stain-causing could get on my clothes. (My clumsiness is a family legend.) Between the heat of the subway stations and the dry AC in my office, it was shaping up to be a bad hair day, but nothing was going to get in the way of my fast-approaching coolness.
I’ll probably post some more things I’ve been working on soon but right now I’m reading about Freud’s theory on creative writing which is about as abstract as the people he is writing about.
With that administrative task all but complete, thoughts are now turning to the agenda, and the framing of our six demands. We have chosen the model of the Chartists, but the figure of six is not cast in stone. Simply, it has historical resonance, and is as good as any to start with.
And the funniest thing for me was this. The cups were made of a special new environmentally friendly plastic! We are going to save the planet by making beer drinkers drink a tiny bit less beer - 6 mls at a time. Global warming strikes again!!
Uttar Pradesh
Those who observe Lent often choose something to give up for the season – a fast – as well as something to give to others. In addition, we seek a greater commitment to prayer. All this is done for many of the same reasons my old Pentecostal church held revival meetings.
Donna buried her face in her hands and sobbed, body-shaking sobs. Ann watched and put a hand on Donna’s shoulder, despite the disapproving look she earned from Chris. It took him a second to learn that both women had similar pain to deal with. One deserved, one not so much.
2. 9 Greenwich Cove Drive… Asked $2,150,000. Sold $1,167,000. Started 9/2009
Enjoyment: 100%!
My digital's batteries went out when I started the recipe so I had to bust out my spring scale. Definitely not nearly as accurate as a digital or a balance scale - but you have to be resourceful with what you have!
If you are saving your pennies, opt for a mini yellow nail polish. You can add a pop of bright color to your wardrobe for around $1.
In various states of germination are french and runner beans, leeks, parsnips, courgettes, pumpkins and squash. There’s also celery, pea and onion plants in the greenhouse with lettuce growing on and more lettuce, rocket, radish and spring onions sowed. In the garden there’s potatoes, carrots, parnsips, peas, cabbage, shallots, onions and garlic growing away with PSB coming to an end. On the shared plot there’s potatoes, broad beans and onions with a few of last season’s cabbages and cauliflowers left. And the half allotment has so far been planted with more potatoes, broad beans and asparagus.
Think about what you do. What are your activities? Do you travel, do you play sports? What do you do? Really think about what the things in your day to day life that you'd like to photograph. If you like to be in nature, would you like to photograph nature a lot. If you live downtown, are you interested in taking pictures of the amazing architecture around you. There are people who are turning the mundane into beautiful. That's the first place to start. Where you are and what you do may turn into what you like to photograph.
Steve Rogers continues working for SHIELD training the cadets and as Director Fury’s protector from the assassination attempts on his life, Rogers and Fury work together to find the origin of STRIKE and the mysterious Director Reynold who seems to be fascinated with Stark’s work of energry conversion.
at a dead end.
Catherine Marshall writes in Adventures in Prayer about this Godly submission during the writing of her first book, A Man Called Peter.
It is Ben that prompts John to get out of that chair.
For starters, this means that I have to work at a climbing problem until I pull myself up over the top.
"Remember the good ol' days? You remember, back when Pluto was still a planet? People used to laugh, regularly. They would shout, maybe have a little drinkie and, y'know, enjoy themselves? Oh, nostalgia! And, sometimes, people would go to concerts and shows and they would have what was known as "a good time". Man, those were the days. Sometimes, even the band would join in. Maybe they'd had a tipple, too. They would play their instruments out of tune and at breakneck speeds. Occasionally, there might be harsh words exchanged... fisticuffs even. But they didn't give a fuck, and that's why we loved them, why we wanted to be them and why we wanted to be with them.
You realize of course that, as I mentioned a few days ago, that this time of year, (EASTER) chickens do not receive any well deserved credit for Easter eggs. This due to the fact that bunnies get all the credit. Yes….the chickens toil day in and day out laying those eggs only to have stinkin’ rabbits swoop in, beat feet with all those eggs, color them, and pawn them off as their own creations.
Who doesn't love a scone with jam and clotted cream? So good! My favorite go to recipe for sweet scones is Barefoot Contessa's Cranberry Orange Scones. I'll have to take a picture of those next time I make them, they are so delicious.
Vagabond (France) directed by Agnes Varda
I was asked by the ladies of Ignite to style the men’s segment for their runway show. I was asked to pull from local retailers Atmosfere and Martin Patrick. I was really excited about this challenge with having all the freedom I wanted. I really didn’t go in with any game plan for what I wanted to pull, I just wanted to pull some solid looks from each store. I didn’t do any fittings for the guys so my nerves were very high as the date approached. Along with pulling clothes, literally last minute, we lost 2 models which added to the nerves.
No one earned anything. However, the whole of Acocks Green is now without debt, and looks to the future with a lot of optimism.....
Another Sunday, another episode of Game of Thrones. As usual, warnings of kinda-spoilers–kinda, because unless you’ve read the books the clues I give won’t make a lick of sense. This offering, titled “The Ghost of Harrenhal,” spent actually little time in Harrenhal, dizzily transporting us from The Wall to Essos and back. We start off with Stannis’s and Melisandre’s freakish shadow baby teaching Renly, and all newcomers to ASOIAF, the dire meaning of “valar morghulis.” This leads to a case of “guilt-on-first-sight” by several guards who implicate Brienne the Beauty in the crime, and pay for their sloppy detective work on the sharp end of her sword. Nice fight scene. Lady Stark urges the lovesick king’s guard (who was seriously barking up the wrong tree) to flee with her, as Renly’s forces sail away, disintegrate into mass confusion or start lining up for Stannis. Later Brienne takes an oath of vengeance and swears her fealty to Lady Stark, in a touching Thelma & Louise moment that we all know is going to end in a brutal hanging. (see? no sense. not a lick.)
Patterned Paper: DCWV - Luxury Stack
Dragon Lady: How ’bout I fix eyebrows for you?
But the real oddity of this irregular Wednesday was its connection to our adoption. Wednesday, December 14, 2011, was the day Vickie and I would first meet our African boys. How does one meet his child for the first time? On prior first meetings of our children, we knew the arrangements were outside our control. When it is time for labor, it’s time! When labor is complete, it is complete. When the baby is delivered–well, that’s when you get to meet him. With adoption, it is different. Plane tickets are purchased in advance to reach Africa. You know well ahead of time when and where you will meet your child.
The report contains multiple spelling and grammatical errors such as the misspelling name of the Senedd architect Richard Rogers in the foreword.
These are the projects that we made at my Stamp Club this month. I love the kraft boxes that Stampin' Up! has been selling, I really hope they put them in the main catalog this year. I used a lot of product from the Occasions Mini Catalog and the Sale-A-Bration Catalog on these projects and my girls loved them! The card is a CASE of one that Kimberly Van Diepen's did, you can see her card here.
Ultimately, politics means just this: Vote for me.
'Expertly steamed' milk? Oh, you gigantic motherfuckers. Expertly? Really? By a milk-steaming expert? Are you fucking serious? They don't look like milk-steaming experts. They look like they always do: the last pick in team sports. As for 'beautiful latte art', I don't think I need to add anything.
Love Crock Pot recipes!!! (well, most of them....those meats all end up tasting the same to me but still easier to just put it on and let it cook w/out worrying about it! :)
First, let's set the stage by showing you my outfit.
Bethesda’s Todd Howard, game director for the blockbuster Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim, also says that gamers should not expect follow-ups to the PS3 and Xbox 360 until 2014, at the very earliest.
Name dragged through the mud on every channel.
Wish Me Luck is a light, easy read. Dickinson's style is simple but warm. She hooked me with the mysteries and kept the plot twisting so that it wasn't predictable. She recreates 1940s Lincolnshire and Nottingham well, peopled with a likeable, well-rounded cast. With one exception. Fleur's mother was too unpleasant, a bitter, shrieking harridan who is never given much development or redemption, and towards the end, I felt that the story tailed off a little. Of course it is inevitable that any book set on the home front of World War 2 is going to feature some sort of tragedy, but it all seemed to come at once, like an avalanche of heartbreak, all at once. Still, Wish Me Luck is a very sweet, "nice" sort of story over all, and despite the deluge of disaster before the happy ending, just the sort of book to cheer me up when I was feeling low.
Well, I don't want to jinx it and speak too soon, but I believe we may finally be beginning a kind of a holiday in Poo Purgatory.
Fourth up was Savage!, a blaxpoitation film following the adventures of a mercenary for hire in a revolution-torn country.
On Capitol Hill, the chorus of senior lawmakers calling for aid to Egypt to be suspended over the affair is growing, and Secretary of State Hillary Clinton has warned that the funds could be in jeopardy.
Yes! You are laughing now
In spite of your real age, be it a kid or adult, a lot of people get pleasure from going to a Halloween Party. If you are web hosting service one of these simple creepy festivities, you will want to spend some time to program every one of the particulars to ensure every thing goes needlessly to say. Customized Halloween night Encourages such as the ones that it is possible to design and style online allows you to customize your own compel to suit your social gathering style completely. These kinds of special capabilities designed for the use include choices as well as instantaneous examine procedures that will manage you the possiblity to make use of own creativeness Holiday ask wordings to create immobile you may be extremely pleased to deliver for your asked friends!
Right after the show Tristan arrived as promised with truck and trailer and some help, but as the rain continued and the hillside proved to be sopping wet, not to mention it was nearly dark, he asked if they could leave the coop along the driveway and return the following Sunday for install. That was fine with us.
And no one here likes Orange,
It bleeds inside of me
This is one side of the story… What about the candidates !! They might also have a say…. may be have genuine reasons…. I know most of you might not agree with this. At times they do have a valid reason, and we cant do much about it. But are there more unreal reasons than real reasons now a days……
El Negro Oatmeal Stout
The bundle went into the pressure cooker where I had already put the water obtained from the cooking of the beet roots, a deep fuchsia colour, a real beauty. Forty five minutes are long when you are impatient to see the results.
The cat jumped onto the floor, his paw riveting into the wood, his mind rattling from the impact. Shaking his head, somewhat, he then trots off. His footsteps are reduced to a miniscule, tap, tap tap tap …
Daughter: Julia Simadore Dick (b. 1958)
You picked up that ring and said, listen, princess!
Now for the biggest problem with this movie. Visually the movie’s beautiful effects and setting are all ruined by the style of Gary Ross. I honestly hope he has nothing to do with the next film because I honestly got motion sick from the constant movement. Now the action is hard to see as the camera moves around so much, but this might be acceptable as the movie is trying to hide the more violent deaths of the children. I understand this, but it’s when we get to the establishment shots of the movie, or quite dramatic scenes, I have a real problem. How am I supposed to soak in the depressing nature of the District 12 when I can’t see anything? Thankfully it doesn’t happen all the time, the camera does seem to calm down when in the main capital, but I shouldn’t be standing up after the movie and feeling nausea and unbalanced thanks to a visual style that doesn’t not feel right for a movie like this.
I really should have known better, but yet it was my very first internet date since the late 90′s. I was excited to be dating. This is going to be sooooooo awesome. I had been married for 10 years with 2 kids and it was like releasing a caged animal. How exciting to be able to actually go out with men! I was really upbeat and positive about the prospect of meeting someone who would give me butterflies. We would kiss and I would feel electricity throughout my loins, the dating pool would be filled with attractive, smart, witty dudes lining up to date little old me! My best friend was jealous. I’d be going out having all this fun in my spare time! WOO HOO!
A thing that separates me from a lot of girls in my generation, and particularly, my ethnic background, is that all the men in my family have been extraordinarily supportive of me. My father, first and foremost, is my biggest fan aside from my mother. He is a champion for women’s rights and he fervently believes I can do pretty much anything I set my mind to, and more. He demanded a lot from me, but ultimately it led me to achieve everything I really wanted. My mother was far tougher on me for other reasons. ”This is a man’s world, and you need to work twice as hard” and she’s right. Not every man I meet is my father-no one ever could. The man is a titan and his shoes need no filling.
Tip Nine–Ask. And Then Ask Again!
and circumstances. One of the things that makes this a
and asked, "Sooo, how do I become an official member of the Clean Hands Club? Are there dues? Secret handshakes? Oh no, I guess there probably aren't any handshakes at all in that club. Unless you use hand sanitizer, that is. Do you get a free sample of hand sanitizer for joining?"
So I should not have been surprised to read a tweet by Ben Goldacre that addressed the use of the passive voice: "dear everyone, when i read your passive sentence constructions i sort of have to convert them into active ones in my head because i'm thick." I was not surprised, but I was disappointed, since I love Goldacre's ongoing critique of "Bad Science" on his blog and in his Guardian column and his book with that title. He is unrelenting, for example, on the nonsense that is "alternative medicine," while also being highly critical of "bad science" when he finds it in more mainstream scientific settings.
This war was also known as the Namibian War of Independence, and refers to the conflict that took place from 1966 to 1989 in South-West Africa (now Namibia) and Angola between South Africa and its allied forces (mainly UNITA) on the one side and the Angolan government, South-West Africa People's Organisation (SWAPO), and their allies – mainly the Soviet Union and Cuba – on the other.
Sent: Tuesday, April 03, 2012 10:01 AM
Some people call this “Artivism“. It can be seen as a form of graffiti. If done well, it’s high-impact, very effective, and also a form of non-violent civil disobedience.
Is the one whos thinks “I can”
Netanyahu expressed the admiration he had for his parents and the way they lived their lives after his brother’s death. “You carried, both of you, your grief with grace. I don’t know where you found the strength to go on living with your sorrow.”
Last Friday I went to a specialty baby store in Toronto (Diapereez) and the owner spent about an hour showing me all of the types of cloth diapers. I'm going to register for those too, it's just too bad that her store isn't more central and that she doesn't have an online registry.
Why would we deprive ourselves of these experiences when they are so readily available to us?
LJ Fort: I’ve always grown up in the church and my mom made it a point for us to attend church every Wednesday and Thursday. Then I got to college and I just knew that I needed Jesus Christ, so once I made the decision to make him a part of my life I found a whole new purpose for myself and it’s been amazing ever since.
﻿The company suggests letting your kids decorate their boards to get them excited about the program. You can order the board with your child's name. I decided to save a few bucks and made their names with paper on the Cricut machine, placed them on the board with re-positionable adhesive (Xyron sticker maker). The boards need to be in a well visited and easy to see spot in the house.
yeah, baby, we have used variations on this line since the movie came out...
-Dr. Anthony Lilles
Finally I went to the market and bought the red cabbage. I took some leaves and cooked them for a while, until a lot of the colour had mixed with the water. My granddad had (amongst others) suggested to add some lemon juice to make the colour more red and some baking soda to make it more blue (thanks). The blue cabbage ink turned green when it dried, the plain cabbage ink purple and the one with the lemon juice violet/pink. I found this ink very light (used several layers to colour the paper dolls outfit), but nice to work with. The rest is done with watercolor, ink and my previous teamix.
Given the unbelievably striking flowers, the actual scientific name probably doesn't matter much to most of us. One of the great things about living in Florida is that we can plant our amaryllis/hippeastrum bulbs outdoors and allow them to multiply. And multiply they will - all of our bulbs came from the garden of a friend, where a dozen plants have turned into hundreds over the years.
music. . . Burning In The Sun, Blue Merle
I reckon it was the former.
MTN Iran Division
Stephanie Plum is such a fun character -- she eats junk food, oozes sarcasm, loves her hamster, and is Jersey to the core. Then, just when I think I've got her figured out, she drops in a little Shakespeare and I'm forced to reevaluate. Ranger also plays more of a role in this novel than in the other two and it looks like the author is setting him up to become a romantic character as well. Hmmm... I'm not opposed to that at all. For now, though, he remains a tough-as-nails bounty hunter and Stephanie's go-to back up for sticky situations.
At the screening I attended, the presenter asked for the audience’s understanding, as restorers were still at work removing the burned-in handwritten English subtitles on two of the reels, efforts that will continue until the end of the year. He needn’t have apologized. The digital restoration, a joint venture of the Korean Foundation of Film Archives and the World Cinema Foundation (founded by Martin Scorsese) to commemorate the tenth anniversary of the maverick director’s untimely death in a house fire, rivalled and even surpassed that of any I’d ever seen. The virtually flawless print was, except for the two aforementioned recalcitrant reels, gorgeously luminous, with jet blacks and velvety greys, enabling viewers to marvel at cinematographer Kim Deok-jin’s incomparably beautiful lensing. The legible subtitles were generally free of grammatical errors.
If you have a home theater system you are aware how important a good sound system is. The issue is that many people end up shelling out a lot of money on the TV and have nothing left for a 5.1 system. Lots of people believe that you have to invest a lot of money to get a good sound system. This is the reason we have decided to take a deeper look at the RCA RT151 Home Theater System.
Warning on the battery inside my Radio Your Way, SH's Christmas present to me last year that I love, love, love and that died inexplicably and I can't get it replaced or repaired because the company is out of business after those jerks at Apple sued them for patent infringement which is a bunch of crap because no Apple product gets AM radio and lets you record radio programs as far as I know:
I truly believe you can’t be wrong picking one of these players over the other, but I will give the edge right now to James. The one big argument against LeBron is the fact that he doesn’t have a ring, but he is only 27 and Jordan didn’t have one yet either. Jordan won his first ring at age 28 and we regard him as the best to ever do it. I’m just saying take some time to appreciate what you’re watching, rather than find ways to criticize it. LeBron should and will go down as one of the best of all-time. He has a lot of time to win numerous championships and score a lot more points. He is one of the most criticized athletes of all-time and still he continues to put up big numbers. James has not yet finished in the playoffs, but he is still great and that sometimes unfortunately gets overlooked. On the other hand, Kobe Bryant deserves all of the accolades he receives. Bryant is a once in a generation type player that has an outstanding resume on the basketball court. It is an honor to watch both of these players play and you can’t go wrong by picking one over the other.
Karl: I don’t think anything bad ought to happen to children. I think the bad stuff should be saved up for the people whose grown up. That’s the way I see it.
Thanking God
Okay, back to my trip to Hawaii. There were some very specific things I wanted to do on my trip – a Hawaii bucket list, you might say.
Chile
Each individual has a different set of priorities.
It means we’re like three women fishing: an old grandmother, a mom in green shorts, a buxom young redhead who lost her float.
Wrong! They’d all leave the club within a couple of years, and have since gone on to do not very much.
The Plot: Davie is an altar boy, living in a small town in England when he first sees Stephen. Before this, it is a typical boyhood; a flirtation with a girl at school, a best friend, a rivalry with the kids from the next town that is a self described "war". But after Stephen arrives, a strange boy living with Crazy Mary, things change. Stephen makes things out of clay. And says he can make them live.
Malema's utterances were considered by the Verkenners Beweging as incitement to murder farmers and were totally unacceptable.
However, as the nutritionist put it, it's an issue of volume. He needs about 150% of the "normal" caloric intake for a boy his age but he doesn't have as much room in his stomach. That means, if a 2 year-old without CF needs 1400 calories, he requires 2100, just to maintain. When he gets sick, (notice I didn't say "if") he will not eat as much, meaning he will lose more weight and we will be further behind.
Come out and enjoy live music from local bands PONG, Opposite Day, and Second Line Social. Everyone will have the chance to win door prizes from local businesses such as B.D. Riley’s Irish Pub, Genuine Joe’s Coffee, Austin Homebrew Supply, Wheatsville Food Co-op, and more!
The Bhatts have in the past come out with interesting themes and although none of them have been outstanding, none of them had such a slipshod treatment as has been meted out to this. Even when there was scope to weave in some reality, the director, Vishal Mahadkar, seems hell bent to drive the movie along clichéd tracks. A few songs pass muster; the supposedly intimate scenes of Kunal Khemu with the seductress Mia Uyeda are also bereft of passion. The most generous of critics would possibly term this as an over simplified expression of an under baked script which has a thick coating of implausibility. I would think that the title refers to the amount to be paid by the makers to those who accidentally get to view it!
Hi folks! It's time for another challenge at the Kraftin' Kimmie Stamps Blog and this week it's my turn to play hostess. I thought it would be fun to use something Recycled or Repurposed on our projects. If you're anything like me, you likely collect all sorts of snippets, trinkets and treasure that you think have crafty-potential...so lets put some of those things to use this week!
Doctors encourage diabetics to make healthy lifestyle changes to their diet and exercise routines and to take medication to facilitate the control of the disease, however, some people just do not want to be taking drugs for the rest of their lives. Others grow complacent once the initial shock of the diagnosis has worn off, resulting in lower levels of self-care and medication errors.
- juice from half an orange
So, how to deal with these unintended consequences. Will I lock up the slider? Let the lettuce go to seed? Put up Quiet signs? Move the house and hope they’ll follow it?
Two young women are thrown together during World War II: one a working-class girl from Manchester, the other a Scottish aristocrat, one a pilot, the other a wireless operator. Yet whenever their paths cross, they complement each other perfectly and before long become devoted friends. But then a vital mission goes wrong, and one of the friends has to bail out of a faulty plane over France. She is captured by the Gestapo and becomes a prisoner of war. The story begins in "Verity's" own words, as she writes her account for her captors.
Well, only managed to drive my mother to the graveyard in order to light a candle at my father’s grave. The usual weekend routine. Then on to the grocery store for some food and back home for some relaxing, tweeting and daydreaming until the night.
“So, what do you think?” I asked.
It is too late to fix the damage already done to the free market private sector by Obama and his minions in Congress but the following charts provide some positive indicators that the November elections just might draw a halt to continuing attacks on "America's Greatness From Within".
Improve your memory - caffeine has had a bad reputation for some time now with reports stating that too much makes us jittery and anxious and that it is better to stick to herbal teas and fresh water to have a really healthy diet. However - some of us may be throwing the baby out with the bath water. For the majority of the population caffeine is a fairly beneficial – useful and safe drug! It can help us boost our brains and improve our memories pretty easily.
I have no doubt that we will be successful in harnessing the sun's energy.... If sunbeams were weapons of war, we would have had solar energy centuries ago. ~Sir George Porter, quoted in The Observer, 26 August 1973
It is so simple, that for some, it is difficult to understand. It is this: The Kingdom of God is inside you and outside of you. Please relax your minds so you can hear. The same Kingdom of God that Jesus told you about is both within and without.
Discussed the farm's new bathroom.
A symbol as well as instance of Spain's devotion to Mary Immaculate are the beautiful paintings of the Immaculate Conception by the great Spanish artist, Bartolome Esteban Murillo (1617-82). El Maestro, as Murillo is called, painted numerous pictures of the Immaculate Conception, the most famous of which is in the Louvre. It represents the Blessed Virgin surrounded by cherubs and standing upon the crescent, her hands folded on her breast and her eyes turned upwards. Similar to it is his famous painting of the Assumption, also in the Louvre.
Even though I began to experience some success self-publishing my ebooks, I still believed in traditional publishing. For all of its flaws, signing with a Big 6 house was still the best way to make the most money and reach the most readers.
How indeed.
We are never – repeat, never – going to solve anything in this our Septic Isle if we remain rigidly trapped in our Left-Right cubby-holes. I am sick to death of mindless mutual trashing sessions masquerading as ‘debate’. Debate my buttocks: What we need is fresh ideas, more bravery, higher standards, socially moral teaching, respect for others and – as a start on the road to that – self-respect. This is a hard, long, steep and slippery climb to join. If you don’t like it, go climb something else – like the walls or something.
Australia who already have the strictest smoking laws in the world have already put legislation together for cigarette packages to be sold in the plain white packages from December onwards.
Some sold, some not, some custom.
6 cups Veal stock or Beef stock
Which is why I hunger to be in nature as often as possible. Only out there, walking, canoeing, kayaking, riding, on my bike, do I quickly and indelibly remember we’re just one of millions of species inhabiting our shared blue ball of Earth.
Remove from heat or turn to low heat and add potatoes and basil. Use a masher and mash potatoes until soup becomes thick. (You can do this before hand in a processor, or mash in a separate bowl.)
But the king replied to Araunah, “No, I insist on paying you for it. I will not sacrifice to the LORD my God burnt offerings that cost me nothing.” So David bought the threshing floor and the oxen and paid fifty shekels of silver for them. David built an altar to the LORD there and sacrificed burnt offerings and fellowship offerings. Then the LORD answered prayer in behalf of the land, and the plague on Israel was stopped.
Step Five:
It is so pretty this time of year to see all the blossoms on the tree's... just like the primary song..
I would just like to say that the standard was astonishingly high, and there really wasn't a single picture that didn't deserve a fabulous prize so WELL DONE to EVERYONE who entered, you should be incredibly proud of yourselves!!!
Eating on the run usually means making decisions on the run. Take out decisions can be a big diet no-no as almost always they are high in calories, high in fat hand high in sodium. All leading causes of weight gain. Pack your daily meals and avoid the drive through window convenience foods may not be so convenient when you hit the scale.
All this comes as the West faces the changes in the Middle East with a mixture of hope and fear. There will be those, driven by fear, who say that the Farr doctrine of engagement with the extremists is about to be vindicated as Islamism topples the tired old tyrants. It is good that David Cameron is on the other side – the side of hope about what freedom offers.
34. Visited the birthplace of your ancestors
Today’s post is a slick table comparing Standards-Based to Traditional grading. I’m a huge fan of slick graphic organizers, so I thought I’d share it.
This next image has a very classical pose, executed perfectly by Holly. In this and the previous image I have removed some planks of wood screwed to the wall using the new Content-Aware fill feature of Photoshop, it actually works quite well, and can save a lot of time in cleaning up backgrounds.
These days, I don't care about landing a big book deal with a major publisher, and am fine with low print numbers. Print has become a subsidiary right.
The 25-year-old describes the sound of her upcoming album to the magazine.
We had been concerned about it after seeing more and more random branches falling after slight winds,
The cards were unpopular with many commentators, who found them vulgar, unpleasant and morally damaging. It would take a drastic decline in the popularity of all valentine's cards in the early twentieth century, though, for the genre to disappear. When the giving of love tokens revived in popularity, this unpleasant counterpart remained in thankful obscurity.
¾ cup Golden Eggnog
#1 – My Auntie came through and set me up with her OB of choice, and I have an appointment first thing Monday morning.
‘cause everybody knows
4 Tb olive oil
I do rest assured that sooner or later the market will find the correct balance between formats, books, suppliers, publishers, agents and all the rest. It will look like nothing it was 3-4 years ago that is for sure. It will be interactive, prettier, more entertaining. Will it produce great literature? Will it produce decent if not great writing? Only time will tell, but I think the market too will somehow find a way to weed out the bad from the good. At least I hope it does.
This can be a simple one,
*disclaimer: these observations are not for people dealing with habitual offenders…people who constantly make the same mistakes and same poor choices again and again…those who callously inflict pain on those they interact with. the act of forgiveness in those cases is still needed, but is extremely complicated.
And, as important as it is between protagonists and friendly side characters, it has to be so between antagonists and protagonists, too. People can hate each other for weak reasons and bad reasons and misunderstandings, but, in the novel, it's best that the reason plausible and make some sort of sense. A weak or poorly motivated villain is actually very dull and can bring a story to a screeching halt. The more justification the villain has, the more one can see his side of things, the more human he becomes, the more interesting, the more nuanced. Even if his original justification has been warped into something completely horrifying, that original motivation and injustice can really bring a story home to a reader. Can make it all the more real.
Y'all know my favorite love language is food, right? So, I made treats for the teachers in our lives. I made Caramel Brownies and used the new tag I made.
What this quotes means is that is it not easy to be yourself, to be unique, or to think differently. This is a world which promotes conformity, where you are expected to play a certain role, to be a certain person, to be like everyone else. To conform and accept what everyone wants you to be is easy.
Still, it did not end there. BBC correspondent in Colombo, the gutty Charles Havilland (Charlie) sought an interview with Samaranayake. He asked why his SLRC branded local journalists who covered the Human Rights Council meeting “traitors” and carry out a “vicious campaign.” Samaranayake dodged it saying he was not aware of such a thing. Not one champion for media freedom stood out at the auditorium when MessersSamaranayake and Abeynayake spoke. The two nayakes got away.
Creep upwards ever so slowly,
Place the dough on a lightly floured surface and cut into 16 pieces. I found it easiest to do this by separating the dough in half, halving it again, and again, etc. until I had 16 pieces. They were more even that way. At least the second half of the dough was as you can tell from the picture below. Haha
For us this was a super emotional roller coaster ride. You wait with baited breathe every day to see how those little fellers are doing. The embryologists were always super punctual and called in the morning before 9. It was nice not having to wonder all day long what was happening and if they were still progressing.
Also I want these dolls on the market before Christmas so time is of the essence.
Alcohol By Volume: 8.7%
So I thought of poor Lucas, my 10-year-old son who has been home sick. Then I thought about how much he hates having his picture taken. Then I pulled out this photo I took of him at the Tate in London:
I now understand.
We would go out on the Friday or Saturday nights that he wasn't on shift. And he was at our house during my school nights that he wasn't on shift. (At the time, he was an Air Force firefighter/EMT and they worked every other day and on his 6th day off, they had 3 day break...)
Tremors
The Progressives are gone now, so you would think that the actions of the governing party would make a bit more sense – but they don’t.
come with a good will or not at all
I soon found myself mumbling to myself “Why in the heck does Raspberries have a “P” in the spelling?”….
Bliss by Samia Buchan
We never found out what the motorcyclist had done or if he was ever caught, but it enlivened our morning.
I own that I cannot see as plainly as others do, and as I should wish to do, evidence of design and beneficence on all sides of us. There seems to me too much misery in the world. I cannot persuade myself that a beneficent and omnipotent God would have designedly created the Ichneumonidae with the express intention of their feeding within the living bodies of Caterpillars, or that a cat should play with mice.Parasites like ichneumonids and cuckoos are and excellent challenge to the benevolence of god and creationism. In real life, shit like "cruelty" and "kindness" don't factor into survival, which is all that matters. As Darwin put it: "Let the strong survive and the weak perish."
kind of beer our ancestors would have recognized.
Yeah, I was the mom that all the other moms would send dirty looks to when Trevor climbed. Where was I? Why wasn’t I telling him not to do that? Didn’t I know he could fall?
I was going to post a new mani, but I've been feeling sick and miserable over the past few days because of my cold. The thing went away for a few days and came back. What a tease! I haven't had the energy to do much, but I'm going to take the time to address a blog award and a tag I was given, both by Carmela of Polished Indulgence. Thanks Carmela!
On the spectrum of sensory input, Jonah’s a seeker (to the often extreme), so I can forget that even he can be overwhelmed. I’m starting to think it happens more than we know or have in the past discerned because he’s almost always smiling. He’s game and he’s goofy. His goofiness is probably the biggest sign that he’s got more than he knows what to do with. When he starts slapping his head three-stooges-style and falling to the ground, you know it’s time to bail. Get to some heavy work or a swing. Whatever it takes…which is how I tend to approach Church these days. I try to ignore the looks that come our way. Some are real, some imagined. I have to admit that there’s part of me saying, “Screw ‘em.” (I know. Nice sentiment to be having in church.) But if there’s one thing Jonah’s given me, it’s perspective.
I would look for any of thoses that
Transfer Fees: $691
Europe, Africa and South America’s labour markets are struggling to recover from the 2008 financial crisis – as people under 25 face youth unemployment rates at a record level of 21 percent.
Give a nod to the world, and throw his towel into the ring
We will meet at 11am Saturday, June 4, during World Environment Week, in the parking lots west of Cootes Drive, in Zone "M"
“Hi.”
W. H. Auden stayed at the Lord Crewe Arms with Gabriel Carritt at Easter 1930, and later remarked that no place held sweeter memories. Blanchland may have been the model for the village in which was set the opening and closing scenes of Auden and Isherwood's play The Dog Beneath the Skin (1935).
Me: Stop it. If he hears you laughing he'll do it again!
Mom would always put out two or four of something. Dad would take one away to make three. The two of them would go back and forth with it, making each other crazy. At the same time, they were just trying to fulfill their own needs. My poor mother was finally outnumbered when my sister took after my father.
I have two people that I have 'observed' over the weekend.
I burnt, and burnt, and burnt.
I have stopped expecting him, his chair or the floor to make it through a meal and remain clean. - 99% of the time everything is a mess after meal time, and that's ok, I expect it and make sure I have time to deal with that before we're rushing off to a new activity.
Make me ride through the bogs
He expounds on 7 truths:
Are you looking for a fun activity for your club or group? Here's an idea: Take a Taste 'n Tour at Licorice International.
1) He traveled with a U.S. … Passport,
What makes Caribbean black beans so good? They're flavored with an enticing combination of ingredients including refreshing ginger, sweet pineapple and orange juice, aromatic allspice, and savory thyme. Spooning Caribbean black beans atop a bowl of white or brown rice makes a happy, humble vegetarian dish that you'll find yourself returning to again and again. And if you'd like to add some protein, may I suggest some pan-seared chili-lime shrimp?
Although there was a large gospel choir, the music ministry rocked out their Christian inspired pop. One of the guitarists for Joel and Victoria’s backup band included their son Jonathan.
In lifting us from the mire
- transactional dealings and raised voices
"That graph is from this patient?"
In contrast, the title story, "Radio Belly" and the final one in the collection, "Floatables: A History" were both incredibly odd and incredibly wonderful. "Radio Belly" features a young woman who starts receiving weird transmissions from her stomach following an appendectomy, while "Floatables" takes place a top of a rubber island, created in a post-apocalyptic world where mother nature is not to be trusted, only the rubber is beginning to peel away and reveal something suspiciously green.
Okay, I have so much more to write, but it's clogging my brain and I'm too tired. So I'll leave you with this piece of advice:
Some they strained and drowned
Jesus stands up and again looks her in the eye and says, “Woman, where are they? Has no one condemned you?” The woman wakes from her daze and looks around and stammers, “No one, sir.” But she is not afraid. She has no fight or flight reaction because she is engulfed in peace. In fact, she doesn’t want to leave.
Everything around us may change, but God’s Word will never change. The greatest book ever written to the family is still the Bible. “Jesus spoke these words … ‘Father … Sanctify them by Your truth. Your Word is truth’” (Jn. 17:1,17).
So there I was lying on the settee yesterday, reading the latest copy of The Author and feeling all my optimism and positive energy drain away to be replaced by a flood tide of doom and gloom.
I went for the wild mushroom risotto (my beef craving had subsided by then) while Kris stayed true and ordered the butchers burger with extra cheese. I have to say, I wasn't expecting much from the risotto presuming the rise would come over cooked and the wild mushrooms would be replaced with chestnuts. Well, I was wrong! The rice was cooked perfectly with just the right amount of bite and the dish was studded with many different varieties of mushrooms. The pesto dressing was a delightful addition, the only thing missing was huge shavings of Parmesan, but maybe that's just me.
Will we have enough time to get this done?
To summarize, private language is formed by public language in two ways. First, it precedes private language and provides its very source. The idiosyncrasies of private language result from the way individuals take and create specific paths through language. Secondly, after this private language comes into being, public language, through education and editing, reshapes private language to make it more conventional and understandable.
It's been on the radio.
From the time Aarthi had posted Water melon Granita I have wanted to try it but never had the chance as the girls’ singlehandedly finish the water melon. The other day when they were busy attacking the ice cream I made this delicious, icy yum replacement for creamy ice cream.
In order to break through the restrictive and society controlled matrix that keeps us imprisoned and controlled, you have to learn to flip the mind to the existence of the myriad of alternative realities that exist beyond our preconceived thinking. Beyond the glitz, and showy and ego built ivory towers of the life we see, lie a whole wealth of other realties and dimensions that show us the truth and open us up to who we really are, and more importantly align us with the true spirit of gods energy and awareness.
The sixth one? Oh he’s still sleeping home for the summer from college.
A great smoothie to calm your tummy.
“This year celebrates 20 years of our partnership with Wheelabrator, so I am really excited to be a judge at the symposium,” said Nina Randall, executive director with Partners In Education. “I am always amazed at the depth of the students’ research. This year, I am especially excited that students will have the opportunity to meet Fabien Cousteau, grandson of the famed oceanographer Jacuqes Cousteau.”
Your Girl Diary
We are not allowed to enjoy nature
So, here's where we are today....
First of all I would like to lose weight (typical girl resolution, haha). I started a diet yesterday. Basically I am not eating any fast food and I am just trying to eat healthy. Diets are so hard for me because I LOVE food! I am going to try really hard though, cause I want to go somewhere tropical for our 5 year anniversary in August, which means I will need to fit in a swimsuit.
I would lay my cause before him. He performs wonders that cannot be fathomed,
Homemade butter tastes fresh and buttery. Of course, if you can get your hands on organic raw cream from grass-fed cows, your butter will be the ultimate. I used grocery-store organic cream. Unfortunately it’s been ultra-pasteurized. (Translation: it’s dead, they took the life out of it.) But, hey, at least it tastes good.
What then stick in the craw is the deceit. "Nearly two years on from coming into office, brick by brick, edifice by edifice, we are slowly dismantling the big-state structures we inherited from the last government", says The Boy. But he is not. "We are putting people in control, giving them the choices and chances that they get in almost every other area of life", says The Boy. But he is not – not where it matters.
You may say it was due to a sense of their calling, their destiny or sense of purpose. But I believe it was because of their thankful hearts –they knew the secret of constant communion with God and their prayers were offered with thanks to God, based on what they knew of the heart of our heavenly Father. They lived in the sound of His heartbeat.
Side One: 1. Hello Hooray 2. Raped and Freezin' 3. Elected 4. Billion Dollar Babies 5. Unfinished Sweet.
The story itself is quite worthwhile even without the thematic prowess. By today’s standards, it’s short and to the point. Le Guin creates an exotic world in the planet Winter that is equally familiar and alien to our senses, like the people who inhabit it. The interplay of trust and perception with politics and an epic adventure across glacial wasteland makes for powerful moments.
Lower Egypt rural = 29%
The opening line had me hooked. There are 3 parts to this story after the Introduction. It begins in Rhinebeck, a small town which has history to it, according to the narrator. The narrator works at a local shop, which he claims sells everything one could need. Occasionally a man would come into the shop, and never leave without spending at least $50. This suspiciously well-dressed man, Henry, over time, begins coming less and less until one wintry evening he comes in and drops off a package for the narrator. He excuses himself without explanation.
Their own IRS statute (not a law) says that it is “voluntary compliance.” We can show you how to be out of their jurisdiction, and we can show you how you can stop funding these people, using their own statues. The IRS is just a collection agency for these bankers, and your citizenship is the key. Is your citizenship in the right place?
The day comes when I realize we can never go back to the way we used to be, I've lost my love for her, or so I think. "I'm sorry, Rachel, I just can't anymore."
The forth and fifth description are also a bit difficult to break apart. In fact, all the descriptions kind-of function as a unit and are generally talking about the same thing, namely spiritual blessings. Tasted the Good Word of God and Tasted the Power of the Age of Come along with the rest of these descriptions are all references to partaking in genuine spiritual blessings in a genuine and legitimate way.
Santa Claus made his rounds at our house, as well as the stomach flu. Fun times. Oh yeah.
I have eight delightful four year olds, this year, who keep me on my toes. Every morning to start our day we gather around for circle time. We say the Pledge of Allegiance, sing a song or two, and on Mondays, I introduce our letter for the week. This morning I was having a little difficulty getting everyone to settle down. There was a constant barrage of questions. "When can we go outside?" "I'm hungry, when is snack?" "Miss Bonnie, I need to go the bathroom. "Are those brownies for us?" ......(you get my point).
You know that commercial where the lady is a wind up toy, and she slowly winds down because of her depression? And the voice over comes on and says stupidly inane things like-“Who does depression effect? Everyone.” I hate that commercial. Loathe it. It makes me roll my eyes so hard that I can cause a mental tidal wave to break into a head ache at times. Each and every time I see it, I end up saying something truly sensitive and understanding like, “Suck it up, Sallie! What the hell could be so bad?” The worst part is that I suffer from bouts of depression. But we all do. There’s nothing superbly sacred about it- there is not one person on this planet that hasn’t been depressed at one point. “Suicide is a major, preventable public health problem. In 2007, it was the tenth leading cause of death in the U.S., accounting for 34,598 deaths. The overall rate was 11.3 suicide deaths per 100,000 people. An estimated 11 attempted suicides occur per every suicide death.” (as in Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, National Center for Injury Prevention and Control. Web-based Injury Statistics Query and Reporting System (WISQARS) )
is that a sign that facebook has peaked?
So, if you don't win your own copy, you can go here and order a copy or three (this book really is a great gift!) and you will be helping other mothers...and their children. I told you this one was fabulous!
~ A.G. Sertillanges, The Intellectual Life, p.199.
Looking forward to the wedding in July !!
“Is she still looking for a job?”
​ I hear her sobbing, then she says angrily, "No, you're not sorry.You're heartless, you're leaving after everything, knowing what I've been through? How can you live with yourself? You're a pig!"
If you love working with purple or, like me, want to really challenge yourself by working with it, head on over to Less Is More and play along!
@TottyBhoy
I started blogging two years ago, back when I didn’t even know what a blog was. I’d read about how important blogging was for authors, both as a way of getting known and as a way of connecting with readers. Deciding to “act as if” I were going to be published one day, in the hopes of making it happen, I created this blog. I had nothing to say, no one to say it to, no reason to say anything, but I didn’t let that stop me. I started yapping and haven’t stopped since. Although I intended to blog every day, I’ve only managed 372 posts in those two years. I’ve received 2,003 comments. I’ve posted in 36 categories, and used 1,402 tags. In the past year, I’ve had five times as many views as I did the first year. Not bad for someone who’d never even heard of a blog.
80. Hi, all my friend call me sheldon. +
It becomes harder and harder. Our souls become heavy and we find it hard to carry on as if nothing has happened. The imprint is there and it’s not leaving.
Anyone spend last Saturday making cards. A whole lot of people did, but I didn't. I was at my grandson's Future Stars Region 1 gymnastics Evaluation & Clinic. Boys ages 10 - 14 compete for a chance to go to the Future Stars Nationals. He qualified! so he and I will be going to Colorado. That is why I didn't make any cards last Saturday. HOWEVER...
So panic over, I have a weekend of partying in Prague to look forward to. It won’t be in Karlovy Lazne, as even though it is badged as Central Europe’s Largest Club, it was quite probably the worst!!
The cake itself is chocolate with chocolate ganache filling, covered with dark chocolate fondant. All of the angry birds, pigs, slingshot and other props are made from gumpaste and fondant.
- seeing you so unabashedly excited when I come home from work, is one of the highlights of my day;
keep voting now scince theres only 5 days to go till the website is updating!
BRUSH, FLOSS ... and do it again. I can't stress this enough.
And last, but definitely not least! Lana is having a giveaway and I've only recently found her blog, but I'm already hooked! You can enter here.
1. Blend all ingredients in the blender and make puree.
For entrees tonight, I was absolutely torn. I really wanted to try the Cassoulet, especially at a restaurant like this, however, I was already starting to fill up. Plus Joe said that he was going to order it, and I really didn't want to order the same thing, so we agreed that he could try some of my entree, and I could try some of his. Needless to say, I am glad that we agreed to this!
Rnd 4) ch1, 2hdc in same st, 1hdc in next 2stS, * 2hdc in next st, 1hdc in next 2sts, repeat from * around (43hdc)
Our sense of having a “self,” our awareness of our existence as sentient beings, and our abilities to contemplate what could be, or might be; to venture within ourselves and find that we have company; to travel to distant locations in our hearts and minds; to imagine, create, and mentally project ourselves outward in both time and space; all of our experiences both real and imagined, all cry out for explanation, in ways that our human science has not been able to satisfactorily provide. Our brain provides the raw material for memory, emotion, and a foundation for perception and awareness, in a way that facilitates the opening of “potential.” It is this opening, which exists always in the realm of infinite possibility, that allows for the unfolding of subsequent space-time events.
Prepare a solution of 1/4 c white vinegar to 2 1/2 c water in a bowl. Gently place berries in bowl, swirl around and let sit about a minute. Remove berries, no further rinsing required. Dry them a bit with a kitchen towel. (Apparently, the vinegar kills the mold spores and keeps the berries fresh).
Pouring High Water, a mysterious project from Japan turns in a slow motion drone epic with “Franklin’s Tower”
Another bottle of now half priced wine followed as did the obligatory silver plate. Providing a £1 tip for a £7 bottle of wine was enough to turn a forced smile into a scowl. Ending the evening with a free jug of cocktails from the Essex girls on the next table ("we asked for Sex on the Beach but we got Tequila Sunrise"... A joke here would be just too easy) was enough to make me oblivious to the speaker above my head pumping out light RnB at a volume akin to standing next to an air raid siren.
The first book Lark sent to me was a little daunting, due to the fact that I have never worked in metal jewelry at all, but I was transfixed by the images on the cover of Heat, Color, Set & Fire and dove in eagerly.
The lover was supportive through radiation and chemo, but he didn´t leave his wife.
As we sat down to a fine culinary feast of la pizza un les pomme frites, of which I reassured Ophelia that the potatoes used, had not been 'wrenched screaming in abundant pain from the bleak darkness of the fetid undergrowth' but birthed naturally by the fecundity of the soil in which they were lovingly contained, I decided to find out a little bit more about the 'Child Of The Night'... I honestly wished that I hadn't sodding bothered.
Yes, that's right, we dipped our toes in BOTH oceans this summer! A short 4 days after landing home from Boston, we set out on a road trip with Daddy to California. He had to do some training there for work, and since we have family in San Diego, it was a good chance to make a family trip out of it. Who cares that we've already been gone almost the whole summer, right? There's one week left, might as well use that one too.
may see them walking tall,
And another voice smoothly sayin' "you ARE a victim. Why won't your God take that pain away? Doesn't He love you? Look at how UNFAIR it all is. You deserve better!"
Phone.com Mobile Office allows you to place and receive calls on your cell phone using your Phone.com office number. This affords business owners the convenience of being mobile while maintaining their professional appearance and access to free communication.
Yes, that is becoming my mantra today “If I had my phone…” I’ve found myself singing “Where mi keys? Where mi phone?” a few times today also.
Hey Laura!
LaShawn – In 2012 my goal is to be Olympic champion. There is nothing else I think about. Every day in training I think about that, that’s what I do everything for. And when I get there that’s what I’ll be thinking about, just getting it done. When I win I will be among the greats and leave my legacy on the sport and it will be from all the hard work I’ve put in on the track.
Find your bridal style with Tailored
It's me again, this is the second post for today so to see the first one please scroll down. I wanted to show the second card I made for Papertrey's 5th Anniversary Sketch Challenge.
Made whole? More like made wholly into an ongoing catastrophe. And BP and deep water drilling keeps rolling on…
You roll little balls of the dough in icing sugar before baking and they crack attractively. Hmmm……how does that work, I thought. Surely the sugar browns in the oven, doesn’t it? However, I looked up crackle cookies on Google and all the entries had similar pictures so it obviously does work. That was encouraging.
Platform: Windows, Mac, (& possibly a beta version for Linux soon!)
Today, our entire world, and everything in it, looks completely different.
Cardigan (Club Monaco, consignment), cami (InWear), skirt (Vivienne Tam, consignment), shoes (Friis & Co.), necklace (vintage 70s, Grandma J).
Tiffany’s is 175 years old this year and as CBS News’ Rita Braver shows us, it’s not just Audrey Hepburn, in the film “Breakfast at Tiffany’s,” who walking through the 5th Avenue doors dreaming of luxury and extravagance.
So for your delight and delectation, here’s my top three ‘good excuses’ to leave your house, that have nothing to do with Islamic New Year- but, hey, we all need a good excuse now and then.
I think I'm a pretty solid runner overall in terms of being able to push through and work around obstacles. I felt confident that while I wasn't going to get the time that I wanted I would be able to persevere to the finish. It was all pretty routine, just another day at the office kind of day until Kathleen and I hit the last manned aid station at 93.5 miles. I had started shutting down since mile 90, things were tightening up and the quads were feeling quite trashed. We caught up with friends at the aid station and chose to rest up a bit. I made the mistake of sitting down while I ate and all of a sudden I felt colder, nauseous and dizzy. Immediately I got up and told Kathleen we had to get out of there. As we walked out I passed by a cot with a warm blanket and it was all I could do not to turnaround. I got scared at that point that I wasn't going to finish, that I was going to pass out and deemed unable to continue. Fortunately I felt better as we kept moving and eventually I traced it down to being low on my electrolytes. The gels were making me ill and the sweetness of the energy drink was not helping. I made the switch to water but in the midst of all of this I had forgotten to take my salt and it had been five hours since I had taken my last salt cap. I made the correction and by the time we finished I was right as rain.
1. Manipulating markets illegally – already on the increase thanks to technology – is going to get a whole lot easier. A secret scam is more likely to remain secret if just one brokerage is involved, rather than 92.
delight and worth the visit ....
That fit in boxes, mujer acurrucada en una caja
This giveaway was sponsored solely by me. No goods or services were donated.
I'm sure that the owner loves their dog. I'm sure they spoil it rotten and hate letting it out of their sight. It's most likely that when the owners returned to their car (which we didn't see because we left before they did) the dog welcomed them with open arms, so to speak, tail wagging and ears pinned back in absolute relief that its unconditional love was appreciated. I've been in town many times on hot days when I've seen dogs in cars, then seen the same car parked on a supermarket car park and the dog still in the car, barking and completely losing it. Is this really a fair way to treat the animals we adore?
Will this claim ever get to court for a full hearing? I don’t think so. He must be funding it privately (there is no way he can go with a no win, no fee deal here) and these cases are very expensive.
My Spiritual work is my passion, sharing and expressing my gifts, truths, Being who I am. It remains successful as long as I maintain the focus from within my heart, feeling the passion energy.
So after that bit of excitement, we continued on to Glacier National Park.
Maybe it was on your part, maybe it was from me.
The day the lights turn on after a power outage we rush to do everything we missed. In our personal lives we can prevent power outages by taking care of ourselves. However if the light does go out, be prepared in advance. That way you can get light back in your life as soon as possible and not have to catch up on the things otherwise missed or healing and recovery that has ventured backwards.
Muar chee $5
She coated the chemical mixture on to the tracing paper.
was also a neighbouring vendor at the Drake. Michael and Bianca had a beautiful designed tiered table featuring well designed invitiations, stationary and papers. They describe themselves as having an indie contemporary craft which is so very precise. All of their items are made throughout Canada featuring many products from their own designs and a handful from local artisans and designers in Toronto. Supporting locally is so important and I encourage any movement towards helping sustain our own people and their handicraft.
I have finally managed to escape Perth, the city that did not agree with my digestive tract… I went to out-drink the town and it crushed me like a beetle.
Park Street is about three hundred feet from the State House, so that was our next stop. You saw the night shot… here’s the day shot. Thankfully the Occupy nincompoops had been given the boot by the city. They were protesting their “right” to public transportation. Since when is that a right? Last I checked, the Constitution doesn’t grant anyone the right to public transportation. Sooo stupid.
The “Luna Moth” is born without a mouth, never eats or drinks.
I have a well-documented weakness for blushers, can’t seem to help myself when I see pretty blushers waiting to come home with me. On my most most recent trip to Cannes, I picked up somemore Biguine stuff on a mad dash to Monoprix. I absolutely loved my previous blush haul from Biguine so I naturally wanted more.
Says a lot for the Human Rights Act (1998)...
My lover is to me a cluster of henna blossoms
5-5-12 A story about a connection between an investigation of Thunder Bay Transportation Authority finances and the firing of Thad Taylor is circulating. I do not think there is a direct connection.
So here I am declaring my pride in speaking my Brummie! If you fancy learning Brummie you can start by learning correct pronunciation by practicing this text (Thanks to MDS and the article here) - Brummie is italicised.
So each night I fall into bed with the man I married nearly twenty years ago, when I was just a slip of a girl, all elbows and sharp edges. That first ache to close the distance between two humans is ancient history now, a shared common image, family folklore. There is comfort in knowing the roadmap of his bones as well as my own, and joy in the occasional surprise. Now, older, rounder, I am less pleased with my own over-upholstered body, but when he whispers you are so beautiful, it carries the ring of truth. Perhaps not to anyone else anymore, but to him, there is still a loveliness in my soft flesh. Allowing for cricks and kinks, the architecture of connecting is familiar as breath, this goes here. Just for a moment we are pliant as newlyweds, bending, arched, couldn’t stop now if the Pope himself walked through the door. Then, like stepping from the Tilt-a-Whirl, we take a minute to regain our bearings. Pillows are adjusted, plumped, the quilt is smoothed. We settle together like spoons, witless into sleep.
Touche, Mr. Mikkel Bjergso. You have won this round. The brew name speaks for itself. Your fine ale beats most of the imperial IPAs i've had enjoyed to date from some of the best craft brewers in the states. I will continue to seek out your creations for further analysis.
08/24/2010 SELL 0.01 xauusd 1227.48 10/15/2010 1366.86 -139.30
L is for Lawsuits.
A problem soon presented itself. It’s impossible to discuss the Middle East in any meaningful way without bringing religion into the conversation, and while I’ve studied Islam, I am not a Muslim. I’m not Jewish either. In fact, I’m about as far from the religious spectrum of the Middle East as you could get. I’m a Unitarian Universalist.
When I paint with this stuff, I like to use this kind of brush (below). It seems to create a smoother finish, in my experience. Some prefer a sponge dabber thing, or a foam brush. Up to you, really!
So I'm going to think up a solution...I promise.
and through many long visits with tiers of family,
And why, after stealing it,
Check out the dineLA For a Year Giveaway, which kicks off today!
"Think I'd better get going" He slurs.
Finally, there is possibly the most perfect ending of any Hollywood film. In the course of the film, a drunken Bogart lashes out at Bergman and tells her about stories with "wow endings." Curtiz's film delivers one of its own.
David was a modest man. I remember one night we were in a quiet little bistro in London when a couple of "swingin' birds" (that's what we used to call "smokin'-hot nymphos." It was a simpler time) recognized him. When they asked him if he was the famous ad man he demured and said no, he was King of Denmark.
I'm sorry guys, if I have let you down.
3) Good choice for Dr. Scott.
Rods/Wands: vision, passion and forward movement.
Long wait for parties
Last month I was planning to buy new pair of jeans. Most of my pants are skinny jeans and cargo pants. I only have a pair of straight cut jeans.
29.) Mickey Lolich, Pitcher (1976)
I hope that you like and I promise it wont be as long next time.
I remember my father's photos of the severed heads of Japanese soldiers brought back to his camp in Luzon by Philippine guerillas.
The inspiration:
It finally hit me – the Christmas tree. Seven holidays in this house, plus cats who wouldn’t leave the water alone, plus a tree that wouldn’t stand up one year equaled lots of water seepage. Although I’m finding the floors hold up great to spills, we just couldn’t chance a real tree.
Spray the taquitos with cooking spray and sprinkle with kosher salt. Bake for 15-20 minutes, or until the tortillas are crisp and golden. (I loved them served with sour cream!)
April 1:
Have you ever wondered why there are some employees who accomplish a lot more than their peers on a daily basis when everyone is given the same 9 hours (or 8 hours because of the 1-hour unpaid lunch break)?
1 abandoned
Here are links to a few of the projects:
Ray O’Rourke is caught up in a planning row with his local council after being denied planning permission to demolish his own home.
THE HICKOIDS: Gudbuy T' Jane
Stuff we used:
I also ironed some fusible webbing onto the back of some cute little novelty fabrics and fussy cut them out. I ironed them onto my background and pinned my top to the batting and just raw edge appliqued them in place. I think next time I would use a fabric that is more contrasting, because they got lost a bit on my background.
Granted, I did this in the latter half of the 1970s, in seemingly another era. Another generation. Another thought process. For better or worse, I did this before the seed of corrosive "political correctness" had taken root on many a college campus.
Scary, plain. How one six foot cockroach, can destroy an entire country. With such ease. Buraq, ain't insane in the membrane. No.
ABC King without a crown UK
"This offensive and puerile front page is insulting to literally every single community in Scotland, not least to Glasgow, which it sneeringly terms Glasgone. It is patronising, metropolitan claptrap which lays bare the true nature of Unionism utterly negative."
Around 10:00, my husband Mark said goodnight. I replied, "I'm going to play around with this blog stuff just a little bit more. I'll be up soon." At about 3:00 in the morning of February 6th, The Kitchen is My Playground was born. The inaugural post? ... "50 Recipes for 2011" Project - I better get cooking!
I was crazy, loud, screaming at my twin four year-olds to stay out of the road and I had my own moons orbiting me, (If you read my story about giving birth to farm animals and how my bellybutton is now a cup holder you understand and if you didn’t I will put a link below.)
Saturday was just a laid back, restful day with some
At 7.15am, sweet and sickly music drifts through Pyongyang, like unavoidable muzak. Freedom means your own choice of music. There is no choice of music in the morning streets of North Korea.
Avery is just so much fun and we love her so much!
On Wednesday, students get discounted services at this particular vet — hence, the different prices seen above. It is always a shock for me to walk in and out of an appointment with a bill that’s less than three digits! Hey, we’ll take it!
“Amy pinned this amazing couch to her decor board, because it’ll just be PERFECT for that beach house she owns in her dreams.”
As I got dragged across the car park by a silent Betty who was probably too overcome with joy and excitment to talk, I had pangs of guilt and wondered whether, despite her insisting on the whole bus thing, I was damaging my child by letting her do it at such a tender age. Would she grow up with feelings of abandonment and neglect, and would it be soley my fault if she turned to a life of crime?
Still, Radioactive Rudolf had nothing but contempt for her efforts.
Without my love
Cook time:10 minutes
Derry Mathews is now 30-6-1 & Anthony Crolla, the man Derry defeated now has a record of 23-3-0.
And today in London at the Poetry Society. More work, more reading. It is like summer outside. When I get home some more work & phoning, then I sit down to Twitter and do my Friday 'Neglected Poets' series. So far I have had Clough and Beddoes. Today it was Matthew Prior (1664-1721), with whom Auden would have been pleased to picnic on the lower slopes of Parnassus. The man was a dangerous, deeply civilised charmer. Here is a sample with a gorgeous first line:
We’re under attack
Rob Shields, University of Alberta, and Sérgio C. Benício de Mello, Federal University of Pernambuco. The Magnetism of Xbox Live: The Allure of the Magnetic City and Its Citizens
More than that, when she was leaving the house she had the garage door wide open and she began loudly singing. This is what came out, “PARTY IN MY HOUSE TONIGHT!!!” Suddenly she realized that she had an audience and it wasn’t me.
Deep Love, that's how I describe what we have. The best kind of love. Love that hears when words cannot explain. Love that anticipates seeing each other, finding rest in the others prescence. Love that intentionally cultivates and nurtures, knowing the product is worth the effort.
The other possession occurred while we were honoring the Petwo lwa, specifically during the song for Bossou, the bull lwa. I knew from speaking with the Mambo that this was her met tet (master of her head), so I kept an eye on her while dancing. And sure enough, he came calling. The Mambo’s face assumed a fierce expression as she snarled. Either she pulled off her headcovering or it fell to the floor, but she made no effort to retrieve it. She began charging into people and continued doing so until the houngan got hold of her and asked the lwa to depart.
Yes, I finished a book! Though this isn't going to be much of a review, considering I read it on my stupid Kindle and now can't be bothered to shuffle through finding pithy funny bits or locating the contents page to make sure I've covered everything... Which is why I'm getting rid of the Kindle - but more on that another time!
Here's the first of them.
Racks can hold mops, brooms and other cleaning supplies in one organized place, rather than storing them loose and having them constantly tip over.
Well, she ranted about it so much that I finally let her play the soundtrack for me. And now I'm hooked! I would definitely classify this musical as a rock opera. The music is very catchy, interesting and even funny at times. My favorite songs are Over the Moon, and Seasons of Love. You've probably heard of the 2nd one but didn't even know it. Over the Moon is actually very interesting because the whole thing is a giant metaphor. You'll have to see the play/movie to figure it out for yourself though.
Add the kidney beans, tomato paste and spices. Return heat to medium.
I suggest if you make one of these that you don't reuse the tape for the second side. I did and since it didn't stick real well, I had some blotches to repair. I just used some acrylic paint that matched the drop cloth to fix the mistakes and put the flowers on the good side.
Contrary to what we believed last night, Hurricane Charley made landfall south of the coastal cities and is now on a collision course for Central City. We’re one of the fortunate whose houses are structured, that is, made entirely of solid concrete and essentially cemented to the ground. Our stone walls and ceilings keep out the Category 4 winds that would otherwise tear us limb from limb, but those living in mobile or manufactured homes are not so lucky; the storm will shred
is a quarterly link collection of spring, summer, autumn and winter art, projects, celebrations and more. The All Year Round Blog Carnival: Spring is open until 14th May so there's still time to join us and link up your old and new spring posts.
Any thoughts on Baby #2?
Galvion spoke of Skyrim and all of it’s mods as well as his decision not to play Mass Effect 3.
No kidding…
sa.bInheritHandle = TRUE;
我的呼吸
From a personal standpoint, I find the tutorials very useful when I work on developing web pages for my state agency. I hopet the state of Texas, the international community and its affected populations don't lose this valuable resource. As A UT alumnus, this event will be the tipping point on whether I will be willing to contribute money to my alma mater.
So far, 2 lbs lost.
Still Pakatan cannot afford to rest on its laurels and must be on 24/7 alert so that BN cannot drive a wedge in between the coalition partners. Pakatan must strive to convince the rakyat PR is the better option by aiming to find a common ground in all of its policies and decisions.
The Track is a curious beast: it’s a single speed or track style frame, complete with horizontal drop outs, but unlike the majority of bikes of this type, it’s aluminium. Despite this, it manages to weigh more than a Charge Plug, which is steel. It has no mudguard eyelets because there isn’t enough clearance between the Continental 700-25 tyres and the frame or forks, but it has rack eyelets on both. And although it maintains an otherwise uncluttered, stripped down look, it has a plastic bash guard on the chain ring. The frame geometry is rather traditional so about the only thing that makes it ‘track’ are the drop handlebars and the flip-flop hub allowing you to ride fixed if you choose. None of these observations are criticisms, but it does beg the question ‘who is this bike aimed at?’
1/2 kg tofu (firm soybean curd), flatten
more music more videos more access.
About 15 minutes later, the one hair stylist walked in saying that their client came back in asking if anyone found an envelope with money! I told her where it was and she happily returned it to the rightful owner, saying that I was the one who found it.
Which begs the question: how does a new skeptic starting out find the podcasts they might want to listen to on a regular basis? Just finding and sampling one episode of each of the 75+ shows in English would be a significant chore. Because each show is different, you often can’t get a good feel for whether you would like that show prior to listening to it. Personality and style are major factors.
Unfortunately, however, the weather decided to do a 180 on us and started pouring rain. I should seriously get used to this since it’s rainy season here in Costa Rica right now, which is simply another way of saying weather bipolarism is highly on trend.
Specifications of the disks:
This would not be, in my opinion, a recipe to prepare for a crowd, as it is a little time consuming, and you cannot really make too many pancakes at the same time. Also, because it was my first time making them, I had a few problems. The frosting/glaze stayed very thick, I should have added a bit of milk to thin it out. Second, the cinnamon mixture got VERY thick and I had a hard time squeezing it out of my pastry bag and had to continue to warm it up.
The suit says that the Commissioners “did not explain how their finding that a $2.88 billion cost was acceptable could be squared with their previous finding that there is no evidence to support a cost of over $2.4 billion.”
Assessment:
Favorite Character: N/A
-Make your salad dressing. You should have about 3 tbsp of blood orange juice. To this juice, add the vinegar, oils, agave, sriracha, garlic, lemon juice, sesame seeds, and salt and pepper. Whisk until combined.
“We’re not the typical librarians anymore,” said Rick Block, an adjunct professor at the Long Island University Palmer School and at the Pratt Institute School of Information and Library Science, both graduate schools for librarians, in New York City.
I've learned about my relationship with God. Although my faith was once shattered, I always believed it could be put back together again once I found all the pieces - and I'm still finding them. But like a vase broken and glued back together, it can be made stronger than it was before. Different, for sure, but stronger.
Next up was the 3-door Amish cabinet Dan bought.
And when strong emotions of fear and hate enters, the possibility of an intelligent debate walks out of the door. When people start acting like a bunch of chattering chimpanzees -- or worse -- there's no point in participating in that.
And this week I am linking up to the following parties- Hope to see you there!
The funny thing is though, I do the opposite in life. Albeit with people, not books. It's easy for me to cast aside a person rather than finish a conversation I'm supposed to have with them.
law but show you are committed to our country. This is what America
A French mosque, whose imam says he has received death threats over his promotion of dialogue with Jews, reopened for Friday prayers after it was forced to close down this week due to disruptive protests.
The words that would be describe my style are ………………………………………. sometimes shabby, sometimes vintage, sometimes simple and sometimes funky....if that's possible!
Baby Girl #3 is due in one month! We are getting ready in the huth house; washing clothes, talking about names, getting out baby gear, making lists, packing hospital bags and giving pep talks to the big sisters.
The Law on the Alteration of Family and Personal Names forbids Jews from changing their names.
No need to get dressed and go out in the cold.
Thank you to EVERYONE who believes in and supports our project! We're getting there, and will probably even get to start building next spring...
everything. Yes, the liberal man shall be rich! By watering others, he water
For Brother Vang a most sizable retinue awaited, with much heraldry and many holy symbols and emblems on proud display. Among them, the most sizable man introduced himself as Sir Peder Skewes before naming his traveling companions: Lady Eseld the Charitable, a paladin after her father’s demise at the hands of a demon. Sir Gawen Annear, a seasoned knight struggling to reclaim his former prowess after suffering at the hands of a lich. Sir Wellby Goodbarrel, the ‘Toy Knight’–a halfling of small stature but immense resolve in the pursuit of thwarting evil.
So, I know that sappy country music isn't Tina's favorite genre... but, she has a daughter whom she loves and adores -- so I hope this tune makes her smile. Or laugh. Hysterically.
I’ve been looking forward to this book for months! Miranda came to prominence after taking part in the Great British Bake Off in 2010. She was a finalist along with Ruth Clemens and Edd Kimber – the eventual winner. I wanted all three of them to win.
Of course, the story that kept us riveted this week was Cheryl Miller’s weird admittance to St Ann’s Mental Hospital. The Government, with the exception of Health Minister Fuad Khan, has been very quiet on the issue. And the COP’s return to deaf/dumb/mute status tells me that they are firmly back to being the UNC lapdog.
60+
Camping Failed Prophecy Post-Mortem
There’s no way to avoid it, so I am not beating myself up over the occasional Twinkie in my misspent youth.
Chainsaw, safety helmet, ear protection, chaps and a good ax. Especially the chaps. Mark wears his everytime he uses his chainsaw. Safety first!
Ok. Almost done. I bought a roll of celaphane from Michael's (with a 40% off coupon). I wrapped the celaphane around the outside of the cheese box like a present and gathered the celaphane on the sides using a rubber band. Twine or even a hair twistie would work.
Hubs started working out of town. It's very hard to adjust back into the single parent world. I have a lot of flashbacks and relive the shitty way I parented Elder Spawn during those times. While I try not to repeat those mistakes (mostly a shit-ton of yelling and not remembering that they don't fully grasp the concept of responsibility in a way they don't have to be reminded 8,000 times/tongue-lashed into obedience) I constantly struggle to stay afloat that sea of emotion. I spend most of my Saturdays hiding in my bedroom because I just need a break.
GIGANTESMESPANAKI 12
I did learn something from reading those diaries. Fiction can contain more truth than a text aspiring to be nothing but truth.
With KERS being revived and expected to race again next year, let’s just recap what hardware’s involved and how its packaging affects the car design for 2011.
Meet in Little Havana, a lively, family-friendly neighborhood, and begin a guided edible journey through one of Miami’s oldest neighborhoods. Learn about traditional, rustic Cuban cuisine by tasting and walking your way through the must-visit street in the area — Calle Ocho. This tour is designed for both locals and visitors who want to learn about the area’s history and culture while tasting Cuban foods that have been prepared by the same families from recipes handed down through generations. Meet local artists, watch cigar rollers, take a peek at Domino Park – all while getting the insights of a vibrant Miami neighborhood. This guided, narrated food tour is both a cultural and a culinary experience. All food tastings, enough for lunch, are included in the ticket price.
Contained in this volume are 31 case studies-
My kids really love to have cold dessert especially during hot spell now. You can really felt the intense heat outdoors. Lucky for those work in an air conditioned environment.
Millions of American wives would love to be stay-at-home wives and mothers but because of the economy they cannot – that HAVE TO work to make ends meet.
In fact, according to UK historian Dominic Sandbrook in his book Never Had It So Good, the whole decade is full of myths and misconceptions when we look back at it. For instance, in Britain with almost 60 million people, less than one million bought the best-selling single records in a week, while over 20 million regularly tuned in to watch The Black and White Minstrel Show on TV.
Man, time flies. Sorry, sorry, I shouldn't let so much time pass between blog posts. Last post, I was pointing out just how much more some poor slob has at stake acknowledging (to himself) and then communicating his passion for his fellow fellow to said, um, fellow.
Bossypants by Tina Fey
You know that as a parent it is a great idea to help your kids to develop their more creative side. Parents know that time is always an issue. Between work, chores and just making sure the kids get where they need to be on time. That is why the Casio LK-100 lighted keyboard is the perfect choice for the busy parent.
When you are jaded, or lonesome
-3 different sets of keys in one area in the street
He did not serve a single day of National Service and became a Singapore citizen only two years ago at the invitation of the PAP government, but Angelo Marc Jandugan behaves as if he is the rightful owner of Singapore and ticked off a Singapore NSman like nobody’s business!
I think the best chance of learning more about him would be to access the records of Buchenwald since his Prisoner number 7073 and cellblock 38D, are both clearly listed on his letter. Perhaps other records would indicate his ethnicity.
It will surely another gem in Rehman’s cap. Reports say that the 52-year-old director is not interested in big-budget projects, but friends say he is a big fan of current 007 Daniel Craig. So let us see what happens. Can never say anything for sure in film industry
Judy Jackson
There’s also another project that I have on the side called CLU3. It’s mainly for getting that frustration out of not knowing what to make. Once I made a couple of random chaotic songs it actually helped me concentrate on making Persona style songs. You can check out my chaotic side here:
I also picked up a few puzzles for the kids and 2 small dolls that I don't know much about. Will research them eventually.
If I as the author of over 90 published books find useful stuff in here then you can see how invaluable it is for a beginner.
I had every choice
Ah well!
And did they succeed? Surely they did. After all, with 660 million to spend, surely you just offer each target a large bribe - or a couple of pies - to kick a ball about every now and then?
3) Leave a comment after you post
As a lover of high-intensity interval training (HIIT), I’m glad to see the benefits are becoming better known to the public through articles like these posted here and here from the New York Times. Interval training is something I’ve been doing with my clients and in my Spinning classes for years. Studies have shown (see links above) that HIIT can greatly enhance fat burning, improve insulin sensitivity, increase aerobic capacity, and is also one of the most time-efficient forms of cardiovascular exercise. Although athletes have used HIIT for many years to work on conditioning and speed, most of the recreational exercisers that I speak with may have heard of the concept but they aren’t quite sure how to perform them in their own fitness routine. Let me explain!
Law blogger Paul Kennedy wrote: My question is: should the DA dismiss a case against a motorist or should a motorist be acquitted by a jury of his peers, will (the DA) offer a public apology on Twitter as well? I'm of two minds on this. Kennedy is right that district attorneys shouldn't pursue a shaming policy until they have a conviction. But at the same time I applaud the initiative of Brian Baugh, the University of North Texas student behind the Denton twitter blotter. He's not out to shame, he's out to make public information truly public. I wrote in March that a 21st-century police blotter could be a new revenue stream for flagging media organizations. Baugh's twitter mashup takes us in that direction. If law enforcement agencies take up twitter blotters, they will need to include strong disclaimers that accounts posted are accusations and that nobody has been convicted. But initiatives like this aren't pure sensationalism -- they're one part sensational and one part public service. We're obsessed with crime, and that's our problem, not one to be solved by the media or the police. If a news organization can use a crime map, an interactive live blotter or a mugshot gallery to drive revenue that pays for investigative reporting and arts coverage, then I'm all for it.
For those with an incomplete grasp of the geophysical sciences, "Milankovitch cycles" refers to the brand endorsed by Lance Armstrong.
899***D-IV/18/1985. “Ethics, Slavery, and the Constitutional Convention of 1787.” The School of Law, Loyola University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-1989(4), above, pp. 696-716, and in Item B-10, above, pp. 51-67, 280-82 (1999).)
If there is anything that social networking has promoted, it’s laziness. Additionally, things like this make me have more respect each day for artists who become famous on their own and not through YouTube, Facebook or reality television. Even mediocre musicians like Katy Perry at least deserve that.
We stopped by the seafood departments and the crab legs were $10.99 a pound. It sounded pricey to me, but it was for my mom so I couldn’t say no. The lady at the counter saw my hesitation and showed us the “ugly pieces” that they couldn’t sell for $10.99 a pound. We ended up getting them for $6.99 a pound!
Numerous kind souls have expressed concern that I have been absent from these virtual pages, lo, these many months. Thanks to them for doing so! The sad fact is that in rapid order I lost my internet, my computer, and my job — all prerequisites for so luxurious an activity as blog-posting. I hope to be up and at it again in the future in my traditional Sisyphus-like manner. In the meantime, you can find recent writing on Village-Voice.com, recent podcasts on nytheatre.com, and — most important — come see my show..
A. Naomi prays for me all the time, but I’m ashamed to say that don’t pray for her regularly. I’ve started to be more conscious of it, and keep it in mind, to pray for her.
They LOVE school.
BF: Bye!
It took this dye job:
Toshi, S. T. John Dickson Carr: A Critical Study. Bowling Green, OH: Bowling Green State University Popular Press, 1990.
- Sephora
each voice cried.
Well the last few days have seen Shaun just not doing too good. He is dizzy, nauseous, headaches, not eating, throwing up, miserable and I think a bit depressed.....& who could blame him. They had to put a drip back in today as well. Sleep is his only relief. It is so hard to watch him like this....to be going through all this again.
With MMM12 almost upon me, I noticed that I had better make some simple coordinates that could go with everything. I picked up a bunch of knits from Denver Fabrics on Weds, and I made this lavender top yesterday evening, and the black and white tops today. I have been using Simplicity 4076, which was given to me at some time by someone, can’t remember who. Apparently, it’s a popular pattern, judging by the multitude of reviews on PatternReview.com, which is a wonderful website.
I watched them like a creepy old lady for about 15 minutes from my bedroom window. 2 boys were running around the group with their cell phones held up, trying to take pictures of the one female with them (obviously the object of their affection). She had her forearms crossed over her chest, gripping her shoulders. “We got a picture of you!” one boy yelled. I had had enough. Hours of this crap happening in my quiet, suburban neighborhood as I desperately tried to finish off my bitch of a paper.
- and my particular favourite -
David Levison described another example of overcoming medical dogma, in this case the role of Helicobacter pylori in stomach ulcers, and also, most interestingly, how he feels when making that 'first cut'. It was this question which I think must be the most testing one for an interviewer: 'how does it feel to be a pathologist?', and Sue Armstrong succeeded in getting some varied and thought-provoking answers. Irene Scheimberg is always aware that there is a person behind the slide, whereas Francisco Gonzalez-Crussi prefers to cover the head otherwise he feels he risks 'restituting the humaneness lost through death.' I learnt a lot by reading this book. As Val McDermid says, it is a 'must-read'.
Maybe that's because art has been worming its way back into my life with my recent attendance at a weekly painting class. But before you get carried away thinking I'm learning how to recreate the Mona Lisa, I must confess it's a "Painting for Dummies" kind of class. However, I'm loving it. It feels like a relaxed, easy way of getting back into pencils and paint. I need gentle. I'm not so good at the "jump in at the deep end and learn how to swim" school of thinking. Especially with art. I'm as intimidated by a crisp, clean, blank sheet of paper as anyone.
This is a little shaped card I made using my E2 and the card feature on Just a Note. A cart. that comes preloaded on the machine. It was pretty simple to do. I will put it in a few challenges that I will list under the pictures.
After she was done hugging us she signed to nurse, and did so voraciously. That is the longest she's ever gone without nursing- ten hours - and I'm sure she was famished! She was still groggy and had a few crying jags, but overall she did very well recovering. When we put her in her carseat she dissolved into tears again, but when I pulled out a bacon egg and cheese biscuit from the cafeteria, she stopped crying and devoured it. Poor baby was hungry !
This has got to be one of my top ten favorite cards that I have ever made, I hope you like it too. Just think of how many people would love to get a card tailored to match the camera they have. Cool right :) By the way Sharon if you are reading this, yes it is the card you were meant to receive 2 years ago that I couldn't bear to part with!!!! lol.
the new year always brings in goals and resolutions. I think this a healthy tradition. it gives me time to think about how everything in the past year has gone, what I liked, didn't like, want to change, and want to continue. 2011 was one heck of a year... the good, the bad, the ugly all happened. we are now one month down in 2012 and I don't quite know how I feel about it except that I know I am going to try to make the best of it.
In my own experience, you can work your butt off, put hours and hours into polishing and honing your craft and your manuscript, you can attend courses and go to conferences, spend money on having your work professionally assessed and still be rejected because either publishers are not taking chances, or the wrong person read it on the wrong day, or “it’s not right for our list”, or you missed “a trend” by a nanosecond. So what do you do then? Do you put the manuscript away and begin yet another (and when do you call it quits on all the others you write), do you give up – or, do you look, as Amanda Hocking did, for alternatives?
“You did? You didn’t cook it, did you?” A joke at my expense but I didn’t care. It made me laugh and broke some of the tension. I slugged your arm and you laughed, too. I heard Belle giggle and saw Grant’s smile, for the briefest moment I could almost pretend that we were somewhere else on an ordinary day.
Fred Astaire and Gene Kelly
Yukiatsu: So you say Yadomi just started working?
Do you like seafood? If so, what's your favorite? For me it's crab, crab and shrimp.
The Sew Grateful Challenge
Finding a routine around here we of course stuck to things we did in the valley; movies, pizza, zoo, park, and the beach. We’ll we haven’t done all of them yet but I’m not trying to kill myself right now. It’s hard managing these things and all of my other activities in my life. When I’m with them though, most of that just melts away and I enjoy being in the moment.
NARS Smudgeproof Eye Shadow Base
It is said that the heart beat or the pulse of the earth is at 7.8 cycles per second. The earth’s resonance is also known as the Schumann’s resonance, named after the German physicist who discovered it.
Today would have been Mike Cuellar's 75th birthday. So in honor of the fourth-most-winningest pitcher in Orioles history, I went searching for a box score of interest. I found a doozy: Saturday afternoon, July 11, 1970. The Birds were riding high at 52-32, a full 5 games ahead of the second-place Tigers in the American League East. Cuellar was matching up with Joe Niekro, but neither had his best stuff. The O's broke out on top in the second inning with an Elrod Hendricks two-run homer, but Paul Blair hit a shallow fly ball to strand the bases loaded. Three Detroit hits tied the score at 2-2 in the home half.
This brings "meat & potatoes" to a whole new level. It was a simple enough dinner to be ready in no time, but also one that is sure to impress dinner guests, as well!
Alas each day she grew even weaker still
And now this blog is going to give me the opportunity to read them and discuss them in the entirely innocent, raw way that I intend.
Monday 6:00 – 7:30 PM Regular CX class with me.
I’ve been saying it for over a year, and with every week the probable gets closer to the inevitable: Hackgate will do for David Cameron in the end.
Dec. 19: THE LEGEND OF THE CHRISTMAS ROBIN (with great paintings of Christmas robins - the English robin which is different from the American robin)
And the bell tower sings into the rainy night
Director : Pascal Franchot
And that’s a fairly useful label to be used in contrasting Christian Endeavor prayer-meetings to the kind of “Oxford Group” meetings and house-parties that Bill and Lois continuously attended from the beginning of Bill’s sobriety in 1934. The emphasis in the Oxford Group meetings Bill attended in the East was certainly not on prayer-meetings. It was on testimonies about how lives had been changed through Oxford Group techniques and thereby “attested” that God had done for them what they could not do for themselves. In Akron, however, the emphasis in their Christian Fellowship meetings was on Bible reading, group prayer, topics, and upstairs “surrenders” to Christ by newcomers. In sum, Akron AA meetings focused on Bible and prayer in “old fashioned prayer” or “old fashioned revival meetings” while Oxford Group meetings elsewhere emphasized life-changing meetings and testimonies. The difference between East Coast Oxford Group activity and the “clandestine lodge” of the Oxford Group in Akron becomes even more clear when you look at what Bill said to T. Henry and Clarace Williams when Bill was interviewing the pair in 1954. Bill said to Mr. and Mrs. Williams:
The Church Commissioners today published their results for 2011, with performance slightly under-par, but still pretty good over the longer term. The bit that puzzled me most was this:
Allow for me to turn this hangover’s frown into something a little more comfortable:
Short for “costume play,” cosplay is a popular hobby among both comic book and gaming fans and history buffs. War reenactments and Renaissance festivals (RenFaire being the most popular) are perfect examples of cosplay in action. The costumes are created to match the details and styles of the period for which they are trying to emulate.
that when we die
The school outgrew those quarters and was moved into a stone building, but when that eventually proved insufficient, the affectionate Mrs. Mary Duffau sold her lot to the school in 1882 for $17,000. A four-story limestone building, costing $65,000, measuring 136 feet by 68 feet, and containing thirty rooms, was constructed, and St. Mary’s Academy opened in 1885 as a school for girls. The architect was Frederick E. Ruffini, who also designed nine Texas courthouses (including the ones in Georgetown and San Marcos), the Millet and Hancock Opera Houses, the Texas School for the Deaf, and the original Main Building at the University of Texas.
Joe Lunievicz. Seriously. Joe contacted me and asked if I’d be interested in reading his forthcoming debut, Open Wounds. I totally love that book. It’s heroic, moving, and exciting. I can’t wait to see it in print.
Price: Ruger 10/22 Carbine $229-249
If only the time on my phone moved in reverse.
Now onto a new challenge for which there will be a surprise blog candy from me personally this time .. not telling just yet.
Ferris
Dan Aykroyd has worn many hats during his long and successful career – he’s an Oscar-nominated and Emmy award-winning actor, a writer, director, philanthropist, enthusiast of the supernatural, winery owner, tequila importer and now, vodka maven.
This was a rose that was kinda hiding in the bush, the way the garden is set up is you can walk on the wall, and go btwn the bushes and get close ups.
I'm working my hamstrings
I have had several questions asking me whether a particular horsemanship approach is better or worse for confidence – some were concerned that the only way to confidence was to “join a rope wiggling brigade” while others were wondering if the only way to stay safe was to “tie my horse down and never let him express an opinion”
A NEW BOOK ON BAY RIDGE HISTORY will be launched this Thursday at the Yellow Hook Grille (7003 Third Ave.). Bay Ridge Etc. was written by local journalist Ted General, Bay Ridge Historical Society President Jack LaTorre, and Bay Ridge Historical Society President Emeritus Peter Scarpa. Brownstoner
Because of attacks on buses carrying Western tourists, we had to get special permission from the tourist police to travel by public transport outside the capital.
If that isn't enough to entice you to hop with us, well maybe this will- 1 random person (who comments on all DT blogs and leaves a final comment on this blog) will be selected to win the entire set of our newest line of images called the Smoochies.HOLY MOLY, now that is a great prize as there are 11 images in the line currently!!! You can see the Smoochies HERE!
So, while I think I’m going to continue to do my wall push-ups and crunches on a nightly basis, I think I’m going to save the elliptical for my days off… where I tend to sit on my ass and snack on stupid crap while I play video games.
1/600 Tom’s Modelworks Photo Etched Ship Railings x2
for how many errands we can get done in one day, with no work, school, or kid activities.
I could totally go for some 65 degrees here in MAY!!
This is the hardest but the most important. Hard because it’s so new. It requires me to do things for me that I’ve never been asked to do in my life before.
I'm back with another Macro Monday. It's been a while since my last macro post and I had some pictures "laying around" so I decided to post them.
Set corsets and urbane ways;
Your disease made it so hard to keep up;
It’s Dow Jones News Fund season. Journalism students across the country are applying for this program, which offers summer internships in business reporting and copy editing. Here’s a look at some of the program’s alumni from UNC-Chapel Hill who had internships as copy editors.
Not really, but I couldn't resist. The blog world is abuzz with word for the year posts, and the previous years recap, and all this crazy cool reflective and contemplative jazz.
I think it’s becoming more and more clear that Dan is going to have his heart broken, right? Poor Lonely Boy started the episode on a high note, with him and Blair seemingly on the same page about the future; she wants to get her groove back and he wants to get inspiration for his next book. Dan gets an unexpected offer to join some prestigious literary program for the summer while Blair…goes back to scheming with Chuck! Oh dear! Chuck needs someone who understands crazy to get at the bottom of all of Diana’s lies. So the whole gang join forces and end up at a brothel (because why not, it is Chuck’s storyline after all!) But be careful what you wish for…Blair ends up finding out something huge that will affect Chuck forever! (More on THAT later)
Roberto Mancini was asked after his loss to Arsenal whether or not he thought that the title race was over? He replied by saying that he and his City team were going to fight for every point, and that the title race was most definitely not over. This is a response that I think the manager should give. There’s no way that a manager should give up a title race as long as it is mathematically possible for them still to win. I’m pretty sure I’m not the only one who thinks that way, especially when it’s the league title?
lots of fabulously furry creations from you ladies!!
Finally, in the spirit of giving more glimpses into the "Life" aspect of my work, I am happy to announce that I have cleared out my own little corner to work in my home. This is quite a feat because I share this home with seven brothers and sisters, a dog, a rabbit, and two parents.
The Krups BeerTender keeps beer at 37.4°F, an optimal drinking temperature in the minds of most people. The appliance is designed for indoor use, but the drafts can quickly be delivered outside.
If you are looking for a good old-fashioned Dalek story without too many Terry Nationisms, look no further than The Genocide Machine. I would still recommend giving John Peel's War of the Daleks a chance though. It's really not that bad.
look ahead
Whosoever will be saved, before all things it is necessary that he hold the Catholic Faith. Which Faith except everyone do keep whole and undefiled, without doubt he shall perish everlastingly.
The only wreck dive that my Husband and I went on was to visit the wreck of the Cartanzar. The Cartanzar was a derelict freighter that was moved from Amalie Harbor and set by Buck Island Cove. It was then broke into three parts by Hurricane Hugo. It was an interesting wreck as an illustration of the force of a hurricane(even under water). We saw a moray eel,and a cleaner shrimp. The dive master held the shimp up to pose for the camera, pictures were taken. I guess that little guy is famous in someone's photo album! Although it was a nice dive, the boat was just packed. If you've been in this situation, you know how it goes. Everyone mobs the divemaster with their cameras each time she discovers something new. I know that it can't be helped, but we made certain that our next dive was a shore dive!
My hands still feel dirty.
As mentioned above, warblers can be a difficult ID, and it can be easy to get complacent in calling each one a Yellow-rumped or Palm, when such high numbers are passing by. Today’s counters did log 13 warbler species, including 13 Cape May Warblers, 1 Blackburnian Warbler, 1 Blackpoll Warbler, 1 Prothonotary Warbler (only second Green Tower record?), and 1 Ovenbird. Today’s Yellow-rumps passed a milestone 2,000 for the year too!
*** I've had a few questions about Project 2011, so I thought I'd talk a little more about it. Project 2011 is a group of scrappers who are using their stash for their projects, and avoiding the stores. If this sounds like something you are interested in, click HERE and enter your blog link. You can do it for one month, two months, or six months like I am. I will have a new sign up every month. There are no hard and fast rules. You decided which stash to use, what to make, etc. At the end of the month, I will relist all the blogs and we will all visit one another and leave encouraging comments with our fellow scrappers. Don't worry about details like monthly kits, gifts, blog candy etc. If you have them, great. The goal of Project 2011 is only to use your stash, rather than hitting the stores for products. Love to have more people sign up. It's a great way to meet other bloggers and get some new ideas as well.
But if you are sensitive or have allergies to latex, avoid eating or touching avocados both in cooked or raw form as it contains an enzyme called chitinase that can cause an allergic reaction.
Marianne is hosting book club for us!
The first thing I did after arriving in Gdansk (and taking a bus to the centre) was to find a kebab place! The taste of Poland! Lovely.
Well, yes, it’s a good thing. Except, of course, when it’s a bad thing.
Last Thursday, I live tweeted SF Playhouse's Wirehead. This was the regional premiere. This time, I brought my friend Antonio with me, and he said he wouldn't be able to tweet through the play like I did. But as usual, I loved tweeting while I watched! This play is in the near future, and there is a new thing out that turns your brain into a computer. Of course, only the really rich people can afford to do this, and it raised tons of questions about how this will affect society. Or even evolution - what about mind control? But there were good things too, such as curing tons of diseases. I loved how while two couples, friends, struggled with this problem, the scenes were connected by a radio show guy, who had callers calling in, introducing other ideas. Those were great segues and kept the whole play moving along. The actors did a wonderful job acting, too. This was by far my favorite play at SF Playhouse so far. It wasn't even like a play, while I was tweeting, someone tweeted in that it sounded more like a Twilight Zone episode. It's true, I could totally see this as a story by Ray Bradbury or someone. Yet, thinking about the future, couldn't this really happen? If everyone else was getting a computer in their head and evolving, wouldn't I want to do it too? Would I risk the 30% fail rate, possible complications, and the very real danger of someone else just yanking a cord out of my brain and killing me? I think I might. I wouldn't want to be left behind. Would you?
We all have our opinions on these things, and I for one, am struggling to contain mine. You will always be in my thoughts and prayers, Caylee.
The spline has also been set at the correct grade right up to the end of the teardrop. The photo below shows just how much the track will climb from the bridge at Chilcotts Creek (the gap in the spline on the right) to the teardrop. At this point, there is approximately a 13 inch (330mm) difference in height. The distance to this point is around 81 feet (24 metres).
Sunday- Sassy Spotlight!
Involving oneself with Dummies means waiting, elevated blood pressure and wasted time, says Al. Why hang with Dummies when you can cruise away from Dummies?
Change is the reason we voted by the millions and change is the reason why we will vote again to keep him the building.
Thematically, as cautious as I am in 2011 about any Holocaust facts becoming the ideological property of Zionist ideology in general and Israeli policy legitimations in particular, the dramatic power of the story of a camp survivor who is psychologically damanged past any kind of humanistic repair is beyond reproach. This is especially the case considering that The Pawnbroker was made in 1965, two decades after the end of WWII when the topic of Holocaust survival was only just beginning to be addressed in the mainstream. Perhaps this explains why the film enters into its topic with a pretty high degree moralistic restraint. It makes its point with narrative economy and emotional sophistication in a socially complex contemporary context. Not just the acting, the screenplay is damn good.
What this Coalition is not doing for the Lib Dems is demonstrating our values. What the Coalition is doing for the Tories is demonstrating their values. People are not going to vote Lib Dem for making compromises, small changes to Tory legislation, or being pragmatic in difficult circumstances.
He was there to do something technical and electrical: so nothing to do with the class. He had only to walk from the door on one side of the hall to the door on t’other and get out his box of tools and…
There are no original ideas. It's all been done before in one form or another. Don't let that stop you! What everyone wants is original writing. There's still plenty of need for that. It's hard to explain but we know it when we see it, right?
HEre is my entry to the Charisma Cards Challenge
Think about it. Did you have a hard time loving your kindergarten teacher? She had to be quite a beast for you not to love her, didn’t she? If she was pleasant and kind, you loved her. If she was pretty and in every way lovely, you probably adored her. That’s because it comes naturally for human beings. Love is as natural as breathing. Maybe even more natural, since breathing stops and love transcends. We were made for love, it comes naturally, and it’s easy! What a good deal!
Being human and pretending to be human are two different things. In Being Human Mitchell can go out in daylight without bursting into flames and so can the Radleys even if they have to take protection. Rowan, who is especially sensitive, has to wear Factor 60 sun block. That said, Peter Radley still wouldn’t risk anything as drastic as joining the village cricket team, something that rouses the neighbours’ suspicions. Living in the country is not like the city. In the city no one noticed or cared what he did or when he did it; in Bishopthorpe that’s simply not going to happen. The clues are all there – if anyone can put them all together.
Fort Worth, Tx 76179
The audience look bored rigid.
When I was a grad student, I TA'd for a professor, now a friend, who liked to say, "The best thing about semesters is that they end." He had the right demeanor to pretend he meant it cynically, but I heard him weave it unto an undergrad lecture once and know he had a whole Benjaminian kind of thing going on (that and he is more earnest than he let on). Semesters are great like stories are great like novels are great like movies are great: they have a beginning, a middle, and an end and in giving us a narrative to inhabit from start to finish, they give us the sense of experiencing the only thing we all really want to know about but can't: how the/our story ends. "What draws the reader to the novel is the hope of warming his shivering life with a death he reads about."
Malaysia’s racial unity is actually being destroyed by UMNO. It is because of UMNO that Malaysia is more polarized then ever. It is because of UMNO that religious and racial tensions are wittingly brought up for political reasons without any regards to what harm it has done to our social fabric UMNO in the last five decades has used the diverse populace to divide instead of uniting them. They have been very successful in dividing and ruling them by using unfounded fears involving race and religion.
Big Beat ~ 2008
Anyway Darlene had a big shop to do so while I was there I cruised the aisles and found this....
There were a couple of close calls. Dennis had a shifting problem and I nearly clipped his rear wheel at one point. I know I missed it by less than an inch. The damp roads contributed to another, where my rear wheel locked up as I was braking hard and my front and rear threatened to replace one another. Quick action saved that and still got me stopped. I rely on the rear brakes way too much!
*i'm leaving all of my college friends behind
George Gutowski writes from a caveat emptor perspective.
And then I look up towards the sky.
Cute!!!
As my husband and I was crossing the road to hire a taxi, I received another call …. Hadi is dead!
Glue white tissue paper on inside of lid. Overlap paper for good coverage.
they were making fun of me
With a good comb out and some Paul Mitchell styling spray I was able to get the hair to behave. I took two sections from the front, just above the ears, twisted them under and joined them to a pony tail in the back. I made delicate little flowers with gold vellum and micro beads to decorate the hair style. I used some great paper punches for teenie tiny flowers that I got at Hanky Panky, look how small they are!
Knowing the fact that we will go through a period of difficulty at some point, we need to be prepared for that time. Savings are important. We need to have more savings instead of debts. This also suggests that simple living is best. Other than it is sustainable and may generate more savings, individuals are prepared for any fortuitous occurrences that necessitate moderation in expenditures and lifestyle.
Living life weightlessly,
‘There was a period of mumbling, fidgeting, and purse browsing and it soon became clear that that was all the cash they had on them. It was slowly decided that some items were to be removed from their pile, re-scanned and deleted from the bill. (I heard a couple of groans from the people behind me in the newly forming queue.)
Sight Reading Conctest: 12:30
So thanks David, way to show us once again, that while Bud Selig is an idiot and Roger Goodell is a dictator, they pale in comparison to your stupidity and ‘tyrant-ness.’
into merry-go-round gears
My question is why is something so important seem so impossible?
Performance wise, Sonam was a massive disappointment for me. Yet again, she has a role with scope to perform but seems more concerned with what she is wearing than actually emoting and acting. Though there was the odd scene that she showed a glimmer of potential, I didn’t really empathise with her character and felt she sleepwalked her way through it. I really think had a new girl or another actress would have made this a different film which is harsh but with her contemporaries like Katrina Kaif upping their game, Sonam isn’t up to standard and needs to seriously turn in a credible performance or may find herself out of season faster than quick drying nail polish. I was also gutted that Anupam Kher and Supriya Pathak were reduced to glorified cameos (which they still managed to infuse with class and gravitas) and did not have more to do.
~ Autumn In The Woods ~
Crucially, this book is not just about Moominpappa; he meets the fathers of Snufkin (The Joxter) and Sniff (The Muddler, who marries a Fuzzy)along with the inventor Hodgkins. We meet the mother of Little My (The large, round and jolly Mymble who has more children than can easily be counted, of which Little My is the smallest; it is suggested the The Joxter may have fathered any number of them...).
* 3D pop dots
I also think the mind-shift that Abundance represents is one we should all consider. This is especially true for philanthropy, which is created from abundance but operates in a model defined by scarcity. How does our work change, what might we do differently when we examine those absolutely root assumptions? Even if only as a thought exercise, what can philanthropy look like if solutions are possible and resources are available?
Finnan Haddie Souffle
2 spirits
I could probably get away without any powder when using this foundation. But I like to apply just a tiny bit on the forehead and under the eyes.
i'm the only girl among my siblings, so i am heavily influenced by my brothers.
Tune in for 10 songs you know, but perhaps not quite as you've heard 'em before. Piley's newsround returns, and there's still all the inane banter! So if you missed it at the time, a chance to catch up... or if you did tune in, a chance for masochists to listen again!
There's crisis and resolution. Their scary behavior in Act One makes them seem hostile, but we discover in Act Three that actually, they're not. Ghouls just want to have fun. Oh yeah, they're going to put the boo in boogie, you just watch.
And, if you thought it couldn't get any stupider, here is the final straw....
Riddled with conflicts and contradictions, our divisive society has not much to commend itself. We have not only a Durga to deify but also a Draupadi to disrobe. This dichotomy is of a piece with our double-dealing which is a sort of national trademark. Going by sheer numbers, women constitute no less than a half of our population, yet their travails suggest as though they are in a hopeless minority.
First of all, wow. It's already May 9th.
Restricted Area (PC)
113. Nightmare: Marjorie Dorner
Sure, the knock on Moore by the cynics has been that he never/rarely played against big-time competition. But there is no question that he was a college football passing machine. And I have never heard anybody say that they saw Bray as the equal of Moore.
I want you to go with your pa to the
Someone no one knows.
Madison Woods
Isn’t this one of the most beautiful wrapped gifts you have ever seen?! Thank you so much Sande!
PJ: “Good and bad. Great as you get to play to massive crowds of 15000+ and play on a bill with people you have a lot of respect for. It is a stark reminder at how big these acts are, and as a performer it is hard to gain people’s attention as it would be at a club event.”
There is still time to join in our December 'Happy Birthday' challenge when you might be in our next 'In the Spotlight' feature which will be published on 18th January and of course be in with a chance of winning one of the great prizes on offer again this month.
The diet… is another story.
An SNP council will re-energise North Lanarkshire and bring fresh ideas to improve and reinvigorate our local economy. We will use every tool available to provide opportunities for employment and growth, but we need your vote on the 3rd of May to deliver this.
LUIPAARDSVLEI: Krugersdorp couple attacked by armed men – shots fired, but no injuries.
I cooked them with wine and a medley of sweet veggies. I served it all over cauliflower puree.
Warren Baldwin
What should we do instead of praise. ? To answer this we must revisit our parenting goals. We want our kids to be self directed and act in an autonomous way, self assess and evaluate the impact they have on others and the environment, find meaning and enjoyment in what they are doing, focus more on the process and less on achievement, focus on their feelings – the intrinsic reward rather than achievement and pleasing others. We also want them to be supportive of others and not to manipulate them with praise to get what they want or show approval to others who jump through their hoops.
“How do you know it’s wine?”
We can teach something to this world based on money? Utopia … but we try anyway! … throwing this bomb of love!!”
And they were called gym shoes or if you are older, plimsoles or Daps.
We don't know how much time we'll have with him, so please forgive my indulgence for going on about him here. I know Inigo is much-beloved by my dear readers - please send your best good vibes to our sweet, dear friend. I'll keep you posted on his condition.
I have fallen behind. Shamefully behind. I kid you not, I have stared at the blank page for longer than I care to admit, going cross-eyed wondering where to begin. I close my eyes, take a deep breath and am swept back through the last few months. I land here, right in the middle of the Grand Canyon.
The odds on Hillary Clinton launching a primary challenge against King Putt just went up to 45%.
SanJAsKa: Indeed dear one. You have all now entered the most difficult testing period of your ‘time’. You are now being faced with a clear choice dear one. Many of you are now at the stage where you must choose, once and for all, if you wish to ascend to the heavenly realms and give up your attachments to 3D, or if you wish to stay in 3D with all of the material things it has to offer that you still find attractive. This is the most difficult period, and this is why we did in fact wish to be with you at this time. However, we know that many of you have taken over so to speak, and are doing much of the energetic and spiritual work yourselves. This is why we have felt comfortable with letting you all see your personal ascensions, rather than us explaining everything to you.
Seeking to send Washington a big message Crow will join Wikipedia, Reddit, Craigslist, Graham Hancock, Boingboing, and many others by not posting on Wednesday January 18th. Susan will not be blacking out her blog since she's entirely unsure that
1 tbsp Thai red curry paste
7. Reinforce good behavior. Everyone loves a “good” dog. When your dog does a great job, give tons of positive reinforcement. Then your dog will not only get attention and love from you, but from everyone he meets. This will make him happy and it is a great way to show you love him!
Or at least it damn well should be.
I am so excited for tonight! It's time for our monthly craft night! I will be back tomorrow to share our project!
Hurting is not very enjoyable, but it is very human.
i had bad dream.
“We played on mother’s day, father’s day, had practice on the fourth of July. We played in the spring, summer and even fall. And when winter would roll around we would rent time at an indoor field nearby,” said Nick.
In the second week of my internship, I lived in the village of Amdala in Manikganj district, meeting and talking to many rural borrowers, who shared their life stories of how the Grameen bank had helped them improve their lives. These women were strong, entrepreneurial and hard working, and had just been waiting for that small loan, that tiny little access to credit to help sometimes save their families from extreme poverty.
My exhortation to you today is to practice gratitude. And while you’re at it, cultivate and practice compassion, compassion for self and compassion for others. Practice, grace, play, rest and stillness in your life. These things will produce joy in your life.
I’m a big city kinda girl! Bangkok was NEVER, EVER on my bucket list. But it was a necessary evil that I had to endure to come to SE Asia. I made sure I didn’t fly into here but Singapore instead. Dread consumed me for at least one whole day in Koh Tao knowing Bangkok was my next stop. So yes, this was something I learned about me that I think maybe I knew, but now, it’s confirmed. Big cities, even Bangkok, don’t scare me – they entice me! You can be sure, New York City is now on my bucket list!
Last week at church we had a pie social to raise funds for the youth group. I remembered it's been quite some time since I made a mud pie that I did just that... and I loaded both pies for gummy worms!
UPDATE 2: Their evidence is plain stupid, they say since ‘출진 빛의 기사! ‘ (the title of the previous entry) backwards is ‘사기의 빛 진출’ which means ‘Light of Fraud Entrance’, it’s an April Fool’s joke. We can’t base it off of that, so I guess we’ll have to wait till concrete proof arrives. Although, it does seem kind of fake.
You can find the name of the insert on the front cover. Please refer to the picture above.
This movie came and went without much comment. It was largely disliked by critics. But you know… I liked it. It wasn’t anything brilliant, and it wasn’t breaking new ground, exactly, but it was a very likeable movie, about a quirky subject (bird watching… which itself is a term disliked by that community), featuring several big name, likeable stars who do largely likeable things. It’s a pleasant movie that I would watch again if it were on cable, and if I see it on Netflix on a Saturday night with the Tofu Muchacha, I’m going to push for it… because otherwise lord knows what nonsense I’ll end up watching.
Sorry for the length of this post, but there just isn't any easy way to explain this.
1. A shower tray incorporating a tiling upstand will provide a permanent, watertight seal as opposed to a welded corner seam which is difficult to achieve and will perish in time.
After formatting, you should upload your books to Createspace, Kindle, Nook, and Smashwords on your own (takes about an hour) for FREE and you’re done. You’re published. That’s all there is to it. There seems to be no added reason why — after you’ve learned how to format and done all that hard work — you should pay Penguin to upload it for you. Now, does there?
On a warm June evening in the beautiful rolling countryside of Chester County, a picnic of sorts was beginning to take place at one of the regions most esoteric beer places, Parkerford Brewing Company. It was not your usual picnic food or beer, or for a even bigger matter, nice attire type of affair. It was in the eyes of many, rotten, disgusting, vile, slanderous and that's just the good parts.
Either you'll find something solid to stand on
Looking at the LCA program purely as an exercise in aircraft manufacturing, it does seem like an awfully wasteful enterprise, but it's about so much more than just a fighter assembly line. The LCA program is India's first fighter jet development initiative (the HF-24 doesn't really count - that was more about assembly than R&D). As one of the world's largest and most rapidly growing powers, it was high time that India began research and development of its own defence equipment. Since independence, India has relied heavily upon technology from other countries to equip its armed forces. That isn't a very wise strategy for any sovereign nation to depend on.
Parents, families, community members and art supporters are invited to attend this public showing of approximately 150 works of art by high school students.
This year, the center for all Nowruz activity was held on March 18 at the Crowne Plaza hotel in Seacaucus, New Jersey.
Some new elite will dominate, and they no doubt will in turn abuse their power and will eventually be checked. Such is the true nature of political change.
They talk about music should be about "having a good time"It conveys that the band is "keeping it real" without mentioning how that they "keep it real".Making fun of the state of the music industry.My favorite this year is the one for Deer Tick, a fine, up and coming band. This hard-working "pseudo-hillbilly" band from Providence seems to be getting the attention they deserve and I must say the more I listen to them the more I like them. At first, I must admit, I was put off by their name that reminded me of a particularly unpleasant de-ticking session at Indian Guides camp one summer.
Tang was accused of paying $50 to have sex with the girl, leading some to speculate that it may be the same girl who slept with 80 over men.
Lee and Ditko's Spider-Man tales were, at their very best, anything other than a perpetual round of genre flirt'n'tease with the audience. Their run on Spider-Man didn't pander to any longing for power and escape, but rather focused on the unavoidable, inexorable responsibilities which advantage inevitably brings to those blessed and troubled by coinscience. Every apparent step forward made by high school nebbish Peter Parker leads to his accumulating ever-more irresolvable predicaments and inescapable duties. His arrogant failure as a newly super-powered teenager to prevent his foster-father's murder served as the moral cornerstone of the series, but Lee and Ditko's stories are studded with examples of the youthful Parker appearing to earn a significant measure of independence only to find that life has responded with a new influx of troubles. His job with the Daily Bugle may help his widowed Aunt pay the bills, but it relies on Parker providing the photographs which J Jonah Jameson can use to slander Spider-Man. His first stumbling steps towards adulthood bring him into a relationship with Betty Brant, yet she brings with her a distressed past and a loathing for Parker's alter-ego. No matter what Parker achieves or acquires by chance, he finds that he's even less freedom and significantly more concerns than he had before. In that, Lee and Ditko's work on the character provides us with the perfect superhero metaphor for adolescence.
“I have not heard about this. Is a police report being made? As in my comment below, if it is true or worse, there is such a syndicate operating in S’pore, the police has to take decisive action. I am quite sure the police is investigating these cases. In the meantime, we parents must continue to be careful and look after our children. And let’s look out for one another too.”
I wish I had an artist's eye
His son Kevin was devastated about his father death He always listened to everything I ever told him and I will miss all the special things we did together. Velloen remains have not yet been released for burial because the investigation has not been completed. The SAPS would not say whether any of the arresting officers would be criminally charged or prosecuted in an internal hearing
The same math might be affecting how African-Americans in the House of Representatives transition to the Senate, too. There are currently 44 black House members, a record-high number.
I love the easy with which this whole pattern goes together. There is nothing I dislike.
then you started building a cage of metal and high tensile wire
and then
Dr Liam Smeeth, from the London School of Hygiene and Tropical Medicine, said:
On this day in 1949, the Chicago White Sox scored at least one run in each inning, on their way to a 12-8 victory against the Boston Red Sox. Sox second baseman Cass Michaels had three RBI in the game.
For the University of Texas as a big community of more than 51,000 students and faculties and staffs, recycling is a big thing. Every year, recycling and composting cost UT about $10,000 and $30,000 respectively. From August 2011 until current, the resident hall at UT has recycled 137 tons of material, about 13% of all the wastes, according to Meagan Jones, the environmental specialist at UT. Jones said aluminum and plastic recycling at UT began in 2007 and for paper recycling is even earlier. “We began the single stream recycling in 2008,” said Jones, before 2008, recycling materials were categorized into different recycle bins until the recycling company was able to recycle all recyclable material altogether. Resident hall, where Jones is responsible for, is recycling all over the dinning place, office and kitchen facilities. Jones is also coordinating energy saving programs, training and educating students about recycling with pictures that illustrate what types of products can be recycled and what cannot. Christian Alvarado, a student of UT who lived in Jester resident hall for one year said residents have three bins in each dormitory room, a brown one for regular trash, a green one for aluminum and plastic and a blue one for paper, “It’s not hard to do, there’re big recycling bins on each floor so I just throw them there.” “I’m not sure if it worth it to recycle the paper because it needs chemical stuff to take away the ink,” added Alvarado.
And of course, there was Richard Ruch, famed Victory regular, who appeared to be checking all the seats along the bar, looking for his new spot. When that happens, Victory will truly be re-opened, and things will be back to normal. Great job, Ron and Bill!
We had just pulled in the driveway and as I turned off the ignition we were at this point in the song:
The extent of this persecution is virtually unknown in the West, due to the mainstream media’s well-documented biases: the mainstream media knows that if they do not ignore or at best whitewash the nonstop persecution of Christians under Islam, their narrative of Islam as the “religion of peace” would be quickly undermined. Last month alone, the New York Times ran an anti-Catholic ad, but refused to publish a nearly identical ad directed at Islam; the BBC admitted it mocks Jesus but will never mock Muhammad; and U.S. sitcoms have been exposed as bashing Christianity, but never Islam.
Upon arrival we were given a glass of Proseco and crudite like no other, iced and served with the most divine balsamic dipping sauce. I had to hold off Bry from dipping in his fingers.
The ultimate reason to pay attention to stories, whether at the individual, family, community or regional level, is not so much because of what they communicate but because of what they help us discover. We tell and listen to stories in order to make sense of the world around us, and we do this both individually and collectively. Working with stories in your community can help you reflect on the past, understand the present and build a better future.
Haskell was yellow carded after the incident which left Downey needing stitches above the eye but this did not prevent his team form coming from 30-9 down to win 33-36.
-Add the ginger garlic paste,saute for a minute.Then add curry leaves,green chillies,curry leaves,coriander leaves/cilantro.
I was shopping Kohl's tonight with Davis while Mila took Onni to her first Girl Scouts meeting. Department store music is generally pretty vapid, but this song struck me as especially awful.
According to the NY Times, the plot was foiled by a Saudi double agent who infiltrated the terrorist group and then volunteered to 'carry out' the suicide attack.
Saturday December 11, 2010
Course, getting it in, getting it to the top of a tower block, assembling it. These are all difficult tasks.
I can honestly say, books have added SO much to my life.
Flip page by page and read,
Until next time, Ladies – LIVE YOUR AWESOMENESS!
2. Nope, no more booze for me!
Only after extreme suffering and such losses, that a third of the population is gone and then rest emotionally scared for generations to come, will the Americans really return to God, as we Russians have and continue to do in ever greater and greater numbers.
What Kiekegaard describes above is also exactly Socrates' method. Kiekegaard and Pascal apply it to Christianity.
I fear that i may ruin it with the paints but yet I want to blast it with colour.
And please don't remind me in a comment that the dude in the picture above is a "flasher", not a "streaker". I don't want to hear it.
Status: Excellent Condition with an owner sensitive to the architecture
6. I don’t like cucumbers. Only other cucumber haters will be interested in this fact but I’m running out of even remotely interesting things to say about myself and putting this at number six makes it likely that very few people will still be reading my list at this point anyway and it will get skipped over and quickly forgotten.
I realise now that I had to process this for a few weeks and this was the real reason for my procrastination. I recently decided on a running method that I’m calling “The Ostrich”! I visualise myself as running like an Ostrich – complete with the HUGE ass and “head-in-the-sand” tendencies – and I make sure to strike the ground with the ball of my foot first, as I imagine an Ostrich does. People that I have descibed this running style too have pondered whether it is similar to a style called “Chi-running”. Should I ever get so far as to do a bit of research on this score I might be able to elucidate! All I know is: today I ran over 6k and I’m not feeling any ill-effects in my shins or calf muscles. That’ll do, Ostrich, that’ll do!
The Alice Cooper boy also supported West Ham and one day he planned a trip for us. We were to get a Red Bus Rover and visit every London football ground in a day. We got as far as West Ham, Leyton Orient and Arsenal before having to turn back as it was getting late.
That came unexpectedly. I was expecting a no but he said yes.
As this one was in the keg, I bought a counter pressure bottle filler. This is so I can drink a keg down to the last gallon or gallon and a half, bottle up the last of it and get the next batch in to condition it. While I'm getting the carbonation right, I have the bottles to keep me sated.
More significantly, the last time officials used the argument of needing to clean the park as a pretense for eviction, the protesters thoroughly scrubbed the place themselves. It’s clear the only thing Bloomberg really wants to protect is his political power and the power of his economic cohort.
It is God Who gives me victory at all times! Amen!
brussel sprouts with pancetta and fresh sage
'Cause the joy of the Lord is real
“The documentary suggests that many children could have been protected from the sexual predator if Cardinal Brady had not been so invested in protecting the church,” One in Four said.
Scrapbooker
For the nine days I stayed in the house after witnessing the B-movie love scene I came home to that midnight, I slept on the couch. Couch sleeping sucks. Why didn’t I tell her to sleep on the couch? Compassion? Self-righteousness? She had a way of making the bedroom hers for most of our marriage. Using it like a sanctuary. I always felt guilty creeping in two or three hours after she’d fallen asleep – she goes to bed at 10 or so and I need the night time to think — so I would try not to make any noise and disturb her. A heavy reliance on prescription meds and red wine helped her insomnia, but there would always be the white noise of a fan she used. I prefer quiet. She liked to cover and close all the windows and close the door to the hallway. I prefer open windows and the door open. With our kids asleep downstairs, I want to know if there’s a reason to protect them. I don’t worry about getting enough sleep. If I need more, I figure my body will tell me so. She stresses out about sleep and it stressed me out dealing with her sleep issues. When bedroom habits are incompatible, it’s hell on a marriage.
The reason I say I'm negative is because I've been burned so many times. I was raised to think the best of people. I had a good childhood. Growing up my family and friends was very supportive and seemed like they would do anything for you. I credit my positive back ground to two things, my father and the military. And I'm talking military preGWB. That's a whole another story. In today’s world it just appears that people only care about themselves. There are no longer neighbors you can trust. There are no longer courteous drivers on the road. Nobody seems to open doors for women or help children when they fall down. People have no honor or integrity in America anymore.
There is a song of redemption
The Android Ice Cream Sandwich operating system is Google’s best effort yet, and with the new iteration we’re seeing Android tablets become smoother and easier to navigate.
God always answers prayer. Sometimes He says yes; sometimes He says no; and sometimes He says, “Wait a Minute.” And since to the Lord a day is the same as a thousand years (2 Pet. 3:8), that could mean a ten -year wait for us. So ask in faith, but rest in peace-filled patience.
Why are they playing this game regarding England's identity? It should be easy to check tribal records, should it not, where England's genealogy may be found? Isn't that what 'news reporters' or journalists are supposed to do, or at least what they once did in saner times?
Give me a knob gag any day.
What's next for Jerry Hopkins?
Driving through Sussex, you can travel through time as well as space. The main roads inhabit a world of wi-fi, retail parks and smoothies, but take a B road and you suddenly find yourself among the ghosts of other Englands: medieval, Georgian, Victorian and early 20th century, where woodsmoke rises from the chimneys of solitary cottages and death watch beetles rattle in ancient beams (I originally wrote 'death watch beatles', which would be a good name for a geriatric tribute act).
Don't be fooled. Whether permanent or temporary, a copyright transfer is a copyright transfer, and its presence in a publishing contract should always give writers pause.
I asked if she’d share her recipe, and was stunned to discover how easy this toffee was to prepare. “Three easy steps,” she smiled and explained. First, you make the toffee in a saucepan using sugar, butter, and almonds, and then spread it in a baking sheet. Next, you sprinkle chocolate chips over the warm toffee until they melt, and then add a dusting of crushed walnuts. Finally, you chill the mixture, and then break it into chunks! Voilà!
This question drives me crazy.
Second, turning to the international level, we draw upon a growing body of international relations and international legal scholarship that focuses on the promise of regulation through transnational networks, with a particular emphasis on the prospect of "deliberation" as a form of decision-making in which governmental and non-governmental actors put aside fixed positions and negotiating tactics in favor of a collective search for better understanding and better policy. We find, however, that the record of transatlantic deliberation on genetically modified organisms (GMOs) has largely been one of failure. Deliberation, we argue, is a hothouse flower that flourishes only under restrictive conditions. The sharp disagreements, intense politicization, and distributive conflicts that characterize agricultural biotechnology have all prevented US and EU policymakers from engaging in a joint deliberative search for the best policy in this area.
After breakfast, I was out to the bus station to catch a bus to Limerick. I had an hour to wait, so I sat in the mall that was attached to the bus station. I confused a clerk at a convenience store by asking if she had any of yesterday’s newspapers. I had remembered a cross-country trick of stuffing old newspapers in your shoes to dry them out.
Your faith in other people is a direct result of your faith in God.
(Led Zepplin)
House is unavailable to the team through all this so Chase has the epiphany and it’s a tumor causing Emily’s illness. Finally. Let’s get this kid well so I can start breathing again.
I'm no economist, but it seems to me that if you continue to borrow money without making any new money to pay it back, you're going to eventually run into trouble. It's like trying to pay your Visa bill with your MasterCard. But what do I know? I'm just a dumb, conservative hillbilly.
But I would insist that the economic arts are just as honorably and authentically refinable as the fine arts. And so I am nominating economy for an equal standing among the arts and humanities. I mean, not economics, but economy, the making of the human household upon the earth: the arts of adapting kindly the many human households to the earth’s many ecosystems and human neighborhoods. This is the economy that the most public and influential economists never talk about, the economy that is the primary vocation and responsibility of every one of us.
Late night is one of my favorite times. The three pugs and I settle into the over-sized recliner, the boys on my right...
“We’ve seen some encouraging efforts to combat the world’s climate crisis in the past few years.
Crowd control weapons, including "sleeping gas," are now on the shelves of government enforcement agencies.
In 2008 Sabrina Minardi, De Pedis girlfriend at the time of Emanuela’s disappearance sensationally claimed that now dead American monsignor Paul Marcinkus, the controversial chief of the Vatican bank, was behind the kidnap.
Then the unthinkable. TWB Girl involves ME.
32. Xi Lu Han is the full name of Lu Han (루한 / 鹿 晗)
– Championship football game format that includes semifinal match-ups
July 21, 2011
to work out whether your roots have so entwined together that it is
Nalluri maintained a relaxed atmosphere on the set as well as a collaborative feel so that everyone felt they were working on something special. He prepared thoroughly for every day of shooting so he would be able to work with the actors more closely. He shot the film over seven weeks, recreating 1939 London on location and at the legendary Ealing Studios with the considerable help of cinematographer John de Borman (The Full Monty) and production designer Sarah Greenwood (Atonement). For inspiration, they looked at several photographers, like Yevonde Cumbers, a famous London shutterbug known for a stylized kind of full-color graphics. De Borman decided to eschew the traditional period look for a lot of color and not overlight scenes or soften the lenses in order to achieve the fairy tale look they wanted. Delysia’s apartment was built at Ealing Studios in the style of period decorators Dorothy Draper and William Haines. For location shooting in London, the filmmakers sought out places that could be affordably transformed back to the ‘30s, like South London’s Rivoli Ballroom, which was made to resemble an authentic speakeasy, or, like the ballroom at the Savoy Hotel, a location that looked like it did back then.
However, the Fox effort is a masterpiece compared to the second story. Kanigher compares Flash's relationship with his uniform to that of a soldier and his gun.
I hope everyone had a great thanksgiving. My family and I had a great day very relaxing.
The one group I singled out, were people who have been here a very long time who are married, who may well have children and grandchildren. And I would just suggest that grandmothers or grandfathers aren’t likely to self-deport. And then you’ve got a question. I — I offered a proposal, a citizen panel to review whether or not somebody who had been here a very long time, who had family and who had an American family willing to sponsor them, should be allowed to get residency, but not citizenship so that they would be able to stay within the law, but would not have any chance of becoming a citizen, unless they went back home. I don’t think grandmothers and grandfathers will self-deport.
As it happens, I belong to the same "cult" as Mitt Romeny. I'm a Mormon. I belong to the Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints. And I'm a Christian. Whatever you want to call me, it doesn't change my relationship with my Savior, Jesus Christ. And, consequently, I don't feel compelled to defend my Christianity. But I do find it interesting to discuss one point of evidence often used to distinguish Mormonism from other forms of Christianity. That is our focus on works.
Wolverines: Tom Brady, Braylon Edwards
I don’t know why I’m unable to be completely honest with T. I know I should, since the only person I’m hurting by sticking with something that isn’t working anymore is myself. Terry said something in her comment to me that clicked with me: “as you continue to heal, your feelings will change, and maybe this is one area that really has”
It wasn't supposed to be anything. It just was a comic book without being based on one. Look at the cinematography, the harsh contrast of light and shadow, the intense camera angles, the editing.. you could take screen caps of every scene and it would look exactly like a comic book come to life. I really love that!
And to let go of what's deemed cool or uncool ...
But why did we need a new standard?
People tell me I'm really showing now (and they're always surprised at
Back on the boat we then continued the journey through the amazing landscape of Ha Long Bay until we dropped some of the people off and moored up for the night. With a few hours to kill before tea we entertained ourselves by jumping off the top of the boat feeling the thrill of falling and satisfaction of the splash, it was great fun.
Shadow of the Vampire: This is a great one that I had never seen. John Malkovich and Willem Dafoe are fantastic! Dafoe is hardly recognizable in his makeup, but his acting is hilariously good! There is suspense, a good story, and a good sense of humor all mixed into this off-beat and odd movie. Definitely something unique!
No such luck...
Will he encounter an untimely death like Crawford, Sharperson and Lima?
6. Developing A Sobriety Centered Value System
Still, there are a number of things that I do like having, eating or doing for Christmas and New Year every time. I always put up a Christmas tree and decorate the house; I normally send cards to our friends and family to wish them "Happy Holidays"; I usually either buy or make the traditional panettone or pan dulce (though this year I was perfectly happy with a Dutch kerststol for Christmas; I will probably make panettone for the New Year) and I sometimes bring some turrones from Argentina to have at hand during the season.
To be honest, the Committee did a great job this year with the bubble teams. The biggest snubs were Drexel and Washington, and you can make a case for them being in or out of the tourney. Usually, the Committee completely misses a team that truly deserves a spot.
as they spend on us at
Ink is Memento Black and Bamboo
It was inspired by a poem I heard a woman reading once at an event in Glasgow Women’s Library. It was about depression as well and also used personification.
½ tsp vanilla
This is one of the larger scrapbook stores in the Netherlands. They also have a
turmeric powder - 1/2 tsp
Elorza JM, Campinas MM Martinez X, Allepuz PA, Ferrer GE, Mendez-Aguirre GM. Vacuna antigripal y personal sanitario: estrategias para aumentar las coberturas en un hospital de tercer nivel. (Influenza vaccine and health-care workers: Strategies to achieve compliance in tertiary hospital.) Med Clin (Barc) 2002; 119: 451-452.
Perhaps it was the relief of walking into the basement in the midsummer, when there was an exact point between overly hot and bearably cool. And as such, everybody found a sleeping place in the underground, where you could actually sleep without sweating buckets.
3 shallots (roughly chopped)
Additionally, the thai restaurant wilmington delaware of Corporations to use their expedited services. In Delaware, there are in written form, which are well thought out and very political Quaker colony of Pennsylvania or to have produced both a president and a very rich history and it is proud to have on the thai restaurant wilmington delaware to stop driving while under the thai restaurant wilmington delaware is short on space, it is certainly long on fun. Between the thai restaurant wilmington delaware, beaches and more, there is nothing wrong in looking for someone who shares the thai restaurant wilmington delaware is no franchise tax and the thai restaurant wilmington delaware. This pressure is continued for the thai restaurant wilmington delaware and seasoned angler alike.
Aren't they pretty?
Today’s feature revolves around a different style of inspiration. Books! Or in this case, book reviews…. As part of my trying to offer a semi-consistent schedule here at the Garden of Delights and to track the progress of my Bookmarks Challenge, I will be alternating book reviews with Your Inspirations (2nd and 4th Mondays).
It is only after we have lost those people who are dear to us that we start to question if it was worth it.
Stuart-Ware seems to either think Love leader Arthur Lee’s talent and musical legacy will somehow be diminished by exposing a sarcastic, rude side to his personality or this is just a big payback for all of the drummers’ problems with Arthur. I’m not condoning any arrogant behavior by Arthur toward his band mates or fans, but it is obvious to me the drummer hasn’t gotten over the fact that he didn’t become rich and famous with Love. The drummer feels unappreciated (your kidding!), and thinks it was the collective strength of the musicians in the band that brought them to their peak.
reforms to try to halt further job destruction as Spain already has the highest unemployment rate in the 17-nation eurozone with more than five millions unemployed and more than eleven million people at risk of social exclusion, as a result of the economic crisis. (AP Photo/Manu
Book 1 – The Hunger Games
I park myself in that spot & want to stay there, but you know...a party of one...isn't
Ashraya is an organization based in India which operates with the purpose of providing aid to Indian children in need and abused women through the implementation of various projects. To read more about Ashraya please refer to this PRESS RELEASE.
The lesson continued its disastrous course and I didn’t have time to react to this new catastrophe. Rock bottom was finally reached when the door to the classroom opened and in strode the head teacher. He took one look at the queue of half naked pupils around my desk, paled visibly and walked straight out again.
I am irritated by how often the words "seasonal" and "local" are used as marketing tools.
Predictions fell all over the place
Take this shelf, for example:
I read many 'recipes' and most of them were all the same. But I did not have any 'Vodka' which seemed to be a popular ingredient, so here is my adapted 'recipe':
For homes in hot climates like Las Vegas and Phoenix, Air Conditioning (AC) typically uses more electricity than any other appliance. As much as 68% of a summer electric bill can be directly attributed to AC use according to some estimates. In order to minimize the effect of summer electric bills there are several ways to reduce this burden by carefully examining how you utilize your air conditioner. Here are some simple steps you can take to reduce AC usage and electric bills.
Al-Malahim Media Foundation, the media arm of the Yemen-based AQAP, identified the militant as Ibrahim Saleh Mujahid al-Khalifa (alias Abi Jandal al-Qisaimy), saying the militant is a Saudi national.
There are gremlins. They are real. Their job is to read anything I write here, then sneak into my head and rewire it so that I go the opposite direction of anything placed on teh interwebs for the world to see.
“I believe the second Obama term will be better than having a U-turn with Romney,” he says. “More stability will mean more visibility and more investment in the future.”
It was time to leave For Home and beat that Atlanta traffic back to the other side of town....
Lesley x
Mix together cake mix, pudding mix, eggs and oil and water in a large bowl.
At the right point of his life he took sannyaasa and became known as Pujya Sri Anaakama Mara. He insisted that he should not be taken to the hospital should he fall sick, but some of his disciples did that anyway. After he recovered and came home he spent his days chanting the Rudram and other Vedas till his last day. He spent his last days in Bangalore, in my Guruji’s gurukula at Vidyaranyapura.
A weekend treat to go down with the sun. A new and exciting bundle of chapbooks, pamphlets, and micro anthology’s to review for Hand & Star. I like it when poems arrive in short punchy bursts, an afternoon long package that can be devoured, critiqued and praised over a few short Sunday hours with a glass of water and a bourbon biscuit.
The changes required clearing tables and stacking things on the dining table, along with the piles of magazines and books, already there, that we had been pouring over these last few weeks looking for design ideas.
Bridget Jewell, Mall of America, gave a great practical example of the Twitter parking alerts used during holiday season. Guests were given real time updates of where parking was available at MOA. The MOA parking staffer providing information was so supportive of the program he took to calling Bridget’s staff his “Parking Tweethearts!” A key point from Bridget was that social media is superb for taking those You-Think-You-Knows about your business and finding out if your customers actually agree or actually act that way. During Q & A the panel was asked if they monitor other sites, if they learn from other social media users. The resounding answer from Bridget was “all…the..time!”
28. Where do you go for exercise? A local public gym? School/work gym? Home?
you can take them to read in the school car line or sports practices. Being theses stories are quick reads you feel like you had a little me time in your busy day.
If the sad sacks hired by your competition finish with a whimper, odds are they’ve been slackers for the whole event. And, it doesn’t matter if they’ve got a fancier, much more expensive display than yours.
Well folks, that's it from me for today. I shall be head down making curtains today....groannnnnnnn
NO BULL PREMISE: Anna and her friend Molly are former members of the British Communist Party, now politically disillusioned, divorced and raising children of their own. Anna reflects on her life using a series of notebooks, each with a different theme. These notebooks are reproduced at intervals in The Golden Notebook, giving readers insight into Anna’s history, love affairs, fantasies and fixations.
He has advised schools, who are members of Fedsas, to call the police for help. If there is an emergency situation, the school governing bodies must close the schools and obtain a court order against the protesters.
Pray through 2 Corinthians 1:3-5 asking for God’s abundant comfort.
This is the third installment of our four-part series highlighting your most frequently asked questions about magazine digital editions. We’ve already covered editorial text and editorial photography and design, now let’s take a look at some questions focused on advertising. Of course, you can view the complete FAQs on ABC’s website. Check back next week and take our quiz to see how much you’ve learned about magazine digital editions.
I’m going to have a lot of fun finding out.
This year we have our first Kandell Christmas Party. Usually the only time everyone is all together on Eric's side of the family is the 4th of July in Ohio.
One thing such an experience does is to eradicate default certainty. When a person goes through this kind of visioning, he or she comes out the other side with a sense of true wonder and an opening of the mind to many different possibilities. Several writers on Ayahuasca have mentioned that one may go into the work with the tea as an atheist, but will emerge unable to remain one. This does not certify the orthodox views of established religions at all; it simply opens one up to the vast and alien wonder of the universes next door.
If your prologue is truly integral to the story, then there should be no question that you should include that in any submission to the agent. If you feel that you should or could eliminate the prologue when sending pages or chapters to the agent, then my suggestion is to look more carefully to see if you need the prologue at all.
I am bemused by the position of the religious right on contraception. 99% of Catholic women use (or have used) birth control, but the Pope wants to beat on nuns for daring to counter the views of a bunch of old men. This also bleeds into the discussion around Planned Parenthood. Let me be plain on this. Young people are going to have sex and it will continue until they die. You can preach abstinence all you want, but it will not even make a dent. It is like trying to hold back a flood with sand bags. So, unless you want unplanned children and expose your children to STDs and AIDs, my advice is to promote as much knowledge about sex as possible. I would even suggest churches have balanced sex education classes. And, for those of you who say my child is not having sex, note that I live within three hours of well-known religious university. People who went there say the kids go wild there as they have been restrained for so long.
Hi, readers! As you know, the Philippine Blog Awards event is already over, but I want to tell you about my speech. It’s not very long, but I think it will do. I didn’t win any award, and I didn’t have a chance to speak . But here it is, anyway.↓
I hardly know where to begin...so I'm hoping you and a bunch of other crafters on Craftster.org can help me out. Let's do a swap (you didn't see that coming, did you?!) where everyone crafts their own version of these critters; then I will have a better idea what to do to these three.
Ready to post our second song, Turn Around, we began wondering what a “virtual CD” would actually look like. After some conversation, we came up with this format. So, here goes! Searching for “Music” on this site will take listeners to an evolving page called “Just Music.” We will add songs as they are finished. That page will become our new and ever-changing virtual CD. You can go there now to check it out by following this link:
Ri’s bff Katy Perry recently shared that she and Ri will be working on a song together.
She didn’t, of course, but Crème didn’t really didn’t want to talk with her any more about this. The human turned on her side, away from the draenei. Ther eewas silence for a little while longer before Brulee said ‘Good night’. Crème said nothing in return, as she had already drifted off to sleep.
Generica also does a good impression of a JRPG when it comes to the graphic and sound departments. The graphics are compiled from a range of old-school sources and, aided by Kentona's excellent map-making skills, work really well when put together. The same can be said of the sounds that are used, as each is used in exactly the right context. A solid effort, to say the least.
Must be reasonably, easily-available. To me, that means that I have a reliable way to contact you & you respond within a day or 2 on average, even if it is to let me know you can’t do something! The important traits I am looking for are dependability & a laid-back attitude.
Maybe the girl was turned off by his anal-retentive need to keep his moving boxes. Maybe she saw it as a subliminal sign. Maybe this was his first step toward ammends and change. Maybe she didn’tlike the fact that he still had all his Legos and Star Wars toys. Maybe this was his attempt at grwoing up for her. Too little, too late; perhaps.
I met Alan Doyle of Great Big Sea for the first time. You read that right, the FIRST time. For those who don't know, I used to travel to Great Big Sea shows in places like Rochester, Guelph, Toronto, Ann Arbor, Buffalo, Niagara Falls, Mount Pearl, well the list goes on! But I had never met any of the band members. I did speak to Sean McCann at his concert in Waterloo last May and now, fter nearly 40 shows where I was in the front row for all but one of them(I was in the second row), I met Alan Doyle. He had earlier given me one of those "I knows you from somewhere but don't know where" looks, so I finally introduced myself to the him. He was very sweet, we grabbed a picture and had a little chat about his foray into acting in the past few years (Robin Hood with Russell Crowe and Republic of Doyle).
1 1/4 cup fresh cranberries, chopped or whole
I started back on prednisone hoping to be able to get things done around the house for the holidays. I felt okay yesterday and decided to get the front yard work done. I was able to do that and was so happy to accomplish something. Today, I have been in bed all day in pain. I am so pissed that my body can betray me this way! I have so many things to do, and I'm stuck in bed in pain and crying over all of this. I just want a normal holiday season. I want to be able to put up decorations, enjoy time with friends and family, appreciate the spirit of the season, put up a Christmas tree without suffering with excruciating pain from doing such simple tasks! If people only knew what Rheumatoid Arthritis does to a person, they would be shocked.
Those on the lookout for good American rural fantasy should immediately get their hands on The Storm Makers, by Jennifer E. Smith (Little, Brown, 2012, middle grade, 384 pages, illustrated by Brett Helquist). It's the story of two twelve year-old twins, Ruby and Simon, relocated from the suburbs to ten acres of midwest farm land by their idealistic (and quite possibly over-optimistic) parents. Ruby and Simon had always been very close, but in their new home, they began to go their separate ways, much to Ruby's regret, and she wonders if "maybe they'd never really been inseparable so much as they hadn't ever had room to separate" (page 10). For Ruby (from whose perspective the story is told), books, and science, and helping her dad with the invention that will bring the family some much needed money are most important; for Simon, its baseball and his new friends.
Lohengrin: Michael Weinius
Sieve and mix the dry ingredients, ginger and chocolate chips together. Beat the eggs with the ginger syrup/vanilla essence and mix into the dry ingredients. The mix should be slightly stiff and not wet.
"Don't you dare sit down," Rachel's mom said. "Get up here and help me."
Craig Shaw, 21, later admitted aggravated burglary and was jailed for eight-and-a-half years in December. Sentencing him at Nottingham Crown Court, Judge Michael Stokes said Mr Wang had been ‘fully entitled’ to pick up the cleaver to defend his family.
What the whole truth is, which I do not say because it's unprofessional and professionals don't stand there and open up their mouth and tell everything they know- "While I like you well enough, I do not like your staff AND furthermore, I should have charged you an easy five to seven grand more (seeing as how you business meeting-ed me to death and I wrote you a contract that had everything you needed, I got that the first time) and let's say even if I did charge you more, go ahead and triple it, go ahead and quadruple it, go ahead and... and I'd still don't want your business and I'm not playing with you, not even one little bit."
Looking for smelly and crowded subways like those found in Moscow, London and Paris? You can find those in New York City and you don’t even need a passport.
Sebastian Vettel, a young German, won the championship for Red Bull, the youngest ever (23) F1 champion and was so emotional on his drive in after the final flag you couldn't tell whether he was laughing or crying.
On a hunch, I grabbed that godforsaken LF again. Again, he wasn't pleased, but this time I didn't put it down. Unencumbered by the crossties this time, he brought his head down and very deliberately kept tapping his nose on his knee. I put the leg down. He stopped. I pulled the leg back up again. He tapped again.
www.directchairsusa.com
Omega-3 fatty acids have been shown to reduce key markers for inflammation.
We revealed that viewers in Malaysia saw 30 seconds less of the report than people watching the same news bulletin across the rest of the world.
If you want to read more about why I believe teachers and students interacting shouldn't result in everyone panicking, you can view what I've written about Facebook in education, by clicking here.
“…no other religion has as much evidence for it as the bible..” Again, could you point to some actual evidence and not some Christian apologist websites? However, I would sooner be a Muslim than a Christian, because unlike Jesus, Muhammed actually existed. He didn’t ride up to heaven on a flying horse, and he wasn’t contacted by an angel, but at least he was a real historical figure. But let us say that Jesus was real and the events of the bible were mostly accurate, for the sake of argument. Let us even say that Jesus rose from the dead and did all of those miracles that the bible says he did, again for the sake of argument. That in no way definitively proves the existence of a god or gods. It may prove a “supernatural” of some kind, but no deities of any kind. I am still quite comfortable in my lack of belief in your god and every other god out there whether or not Jesus was real. Until some real evidence comes out to prove your god, I still won’t believe, why would I if there is no evidence? Threats of eternal damnation? Not good enough either.
People laugh today when I tell them that I am still a HUGE New Kids on the Block fan. I can still remember the first time I heard them. The first time I saw their video on t.v was the day after I found out that my parents were divorcing. Instead of moping around, I focused on the New Kids. Listening to their music and concentrating on them, helped me through one of the hardest parts of my life. They helped me through moving from Lilburn to Buford the summer before my 7th grade year, and starting a new school where I didnt know anyone. So yes, I am still a New Kids fan.
Yes I am. My hubs and I used to love that show Flight of the Conchords. It was an HBO program (I think), not that we ever had HBO, which is why I'm not certain it was on that station. But we owned the first two season DVDs. I'm also not certain there were more than two seasons at all.
On a more humorous note, I have seen several youtube videos of pastors preaching about faith and standing on a pew as they are speaking. They say something along the lines of “As I have faith that this bench will hold me, I have faith in God,” and then the pew breaks (which makes one wonder if it isn’t Satan’s doing. Think about it, it makes sense.) This is sort of an attempt to define faith. Another one that I have commonly heard explained is the wind analogy: You can’t see wind, or hear wind (you can hear stuff affected by wind, but not wind itself), but you know that it’s there. It is the same way with faith. You can’t see God, you can sometimes hear him (another topic for another post), but you know he’s there.
a pear from a branch - we grew Fondante d'Automne -
If you are looking for a book about Abraham Lincoln based solely on fact, then this is not the book you are looking for, but if your goal is to make your child more interested in learning about history and you want a story that will start their natural curiosity, then this book will definitely be on your "must read" list!
I got to work with this image, "Shopping Diva".
Contact: Melinda Grimsley-Smith, (270) 745-5043.
From inside cover flap:
Actress, vegan, BD 2/4/1959
Stay tuned for part two where we will discuss the proposed LA County ordinance.
I started to count.
There is a simple solution to the Smoking Ban issue.
Instead, he got a shocking answer, “I’m only a Christian 40 to 50 % of the time.” The host was taken back by the honesty in the answer. Suffice to say, he was never asked back to TBN.
Then spoon 1/2 the soup mixture on top of the chicken
Lay slices on a clean surface or pan and brush top side with Egg Beater. Sprinkle just a bit of Panko, about 1/4 teaspoon, over the top. Flip eggplant slices over and repeat with egg and panko.
I am already using their shampoo. Normally I only use Kerastase hair products but I was advised by my hairdresser to mix it up a bit once in a while - due to build-up? - because I was having to wash my hair more and more frequently. I must say that I am really pleased with this shampoo. It lathers beautifully and smells lovely.
The Jack Russell suddenly looked embarrassed and looked down at the sand.
In other news, I guess I will break open this nice little tidbit of info for you fine folks to chew on. What does the Craft Ale House, Railroad Street, Lucky Lab and the French Quarter Bistro have in common on, let's say the last week of April? Stayed tune my friends, it is going to be right smart time out here in the hell and gone of the burbs.
I am getting tired of the look of my blog and am wanting something cleaner, fresher, unique to me.
Salena Lima
In April of 2010, the Imam of Imams, the man so wise that someday even the Prophet Mohammad (may peas be upon him) will study at his feet, revealed to the world the TRUE cause of earthquakes: "Many women who do not dress modestly ... lead young men astray, corrupt their chastity and spread adultery in society, which (consequently) increases earthquakes," Hojatoleslam Kazem Sedighi (known as Slammy to his friends) told worshipers and the Iranian media.
It may help if you imagine the following scenario:
One thing to keep in mind is that the demand for succinctness seems to apply primarily to unpublished writers. The Deathly Hallows is 759 pages, but The Sorcerer’s Stone is only 309. Rowling was probably forced to be more terse than she wanted with that first novel: once she established herself as a bestselling author, she was allowed to indulge. It is also true that some debut novels are massive: Special Topics in Calamity Physics, Marisha Pessl’s first novel, is 514 pages long — which translates to about 200,000 words. We look at her, cross our envious arms over our chests, and think, well if she can do it …
Yes, you read that right, I joined another weight loss group. However, this one is nothing like anything I’ve seen before, so I’m hoping that this is something different. What I’m about to say, I’m not proud of, in fact, I’m quite ashamed of myself. However, I know many of you have been through your own slimming journey and won’t judge, so I don’t mind sharing with y’all.
bush, former us vice president richard cheney, former defence secretary donald rumsfeld, former deputy assistant attorney general john choon yoo, former assistant attorney general jay bybee, and former counsels alberto gonzales, david addington and william haynes 2 were convicted as war criminals on Friday.
6 cups reduced fat milk (I used skim)
5) Don't let your kids order shirley temples.
According to CVG the game “propels players into a near future, 21st Century Cold War, where technology and weapons have converged to create a new generation of warfare.
“So this is what it means to be a human being.
Eventually we will become like the Eloi and the Morlocks, although I'm sure some of them already see themselves as Supermen, as they certainly treat us like chattels and serfs already.
"The anti-austerity movement seems content to seek only a defence of the concessions won by older generations, rather than using the economic crisis and a renewed interest in radical ideas as a means to agitate and fight for a fundamentally different society." There is a problem here. I take this to mean those in unionised work, as opposed to the "economic sectors that are unorganised and casualised, or soon to be unorganised and casualised" referred to elsewhere. And a large proportion of organised workers do exist in the state sector. But why set up such a distinction? After all, people who work in all sectors and none depend on workers in the state sector - to heal them when they are ill, to look after and teach their children etc.
And when I find myself slipping into my old habits I will come back to this post and call myself out on it; nip it in the bud. Of course it’s fine to check books and other sources of advice when I have a specific issue I need to check, but I shouldn’t go seeking answers to questions that I don’t even have.
So, last week I admitted that I am a love Indian giver. Frankly, this is not a flattering thing to be in the world of relationships. Makes me feel like sort of a jerk. But I appreciated everyone’s comments and support when I admitted my fatal flaw: I’m not ready to admit love for Chef, or for any romantic partner. However, what’s funny is that I throw the “love” word around with reckless abandon to everyone else but my romantic partners.
Hello all my wonderful friends!
Rook shook her head, ‘That means nothing.’
Blacks were not our enemy, Communism was our enemy. We had several units of coloureds, Indians, blacks and Bushmen serving alongside us in the war. 32 Battalion, The black buffalo soldiers, was the most decorated unit in the SADF. Unita, our ally was run by Dr. Jonas Savimbi and was entirely black.
There are flowers here, all the ones I know
Really. That's more than I knew about their personal lives back in high school. But back then I presumed to assume—and worse, the teachers and administrators did—that I knew all about them, or at least that I knew enough. I won't speak for Lisa and Kristin, but I know the teachers and administrators presumed to think they knew all about me.
It was a story based on an assignment I had given in class: Take a myth or fairy tale and place it in a modern day setting.
When the waters were up to his chin, a helicopter flew over, hovered, and a rope
It's a multi-function product. It has a sun protection factor (SPF) of -at least- 20, that protects the skin from the sun, it has a moisturizing and nourishing action, being colored, it covers redness and slight imperfections, it reduces the skin aging, it prevents acne and it gives an healthy and bright apparence.
family members are: “Narcissists tend to demonstrate a lack of
- Sine and triangle waves sound pure and flutey, because of the equal climbs and falls between the peaks and troughs.
A friend mentioned doing the Master Cleanse together because we both have been complaining about lacking direction in life, being fustrated with men and being tired of being sick and tired. I thought about it, and honestly deciding not to eat for 7 days actually did appeal to me.
It’s the hour to be wisdom’s children and to become wise stewards. In order to steward the things for God effectively, we must abandon our’selves’.
It was this care and effort Dorothy gave in those early rejection letters that drew me towards Dorian Literary Agency again years later when it was time to look for a literary agent after leaving Macmillan - a lesson other literary agencies could learn from. Dorothy was my first choice, so I am very lucky and understandably over the moon that she has chosen to represent me, and I look forward to working with her on the new books including the Secret War series.
“Roughly, the publishing landscape in the Netherlands consists of three categories.
After the main part of this build got lost in a Wizard of Oz moment, we now seem to be back on track. All the parts are here, I THINK I have all the tools, and hopefully there will be some free time to tinker in the garage over the next week or so.
This lady who goes by the internet name Minai, gave a link to my post on Hamsageethe, so I followed it back to her blog post : Hamsa Geethe’s Classical Dance Competition: Translation and Reflection… and I was rather impressed and delighted by all I found..
I was very pleased that the toques helped the family to bond and keep warm in the cool weather. I can only imagine they bewildered looks wherever they travelled. According to my customer, they were helpful in spotting each other on the busy Banff sidewalks!
In her 1935 New York Times’s review of the novel, Irvin wrote that when Carr created “an ingenious plot, a thoroughly ‘creepy’ atmosphere and a really likeable investigator,” he produced “an uncommonly successful thriller, which will keep the reader’s hair standing happily on end until the last page is reached.”
Happy Easter, hope you have a fabulous day whatever you may be up to. Don't eat too much chocolit, I never eat much chocolit!!!!!!!!! (actually can't even type that without laughing its a big lie, I LOVE chocolit)!!
Luckily for Polly (although she won't think so till much later), the orphanage people know that her employers, the Merlins, are charitable people, and after learning that she had been fired just that morning... well, here's where it really gets good. I don't think I should tell you much more, except that no one will believe that the baby isn't Polly's, and after he's been forced upon her, she starts to feel that she really is the mother of the little boy. Of course, the baby does make things a little awkward when she and David Merlin (David Niven) start falling in love.
It was a funny day really - very quiet but we had some time in the garden and just generally chilled out after all our visitors.
Well another week has passed and another week has been worked. I went in for a double on Sunday and expected the craziness of the Idiots and the Hillbillies and Hurricanes crowd to get rowdy per usual, what I didn't expect was what I actually saw.
one of the “parastatal states”
Q. Do you write full time?
1 c. pureed white beans
2 envelopes rapid rise yeast
Jackie: The new album is definitely more cohesive than the debut. Not that debut is all over the place, but it definitely exhibits our earliest ideas as a newly formed band. Now that we have been playing and writing with each other for a couple of years, we are starting to find our sweet spots. I also feel that “This Grand Show” is a bit darker and a bit doom-ier than the debut.
Trigger: I haven’t exercised or moved very much during the day
The whole place is lined with mirrors, so be careful where you 'let go of the day's tensions'. double check your target area, just in case.
I went yesterday afternoon with some friends and was only able to take in a very small part of this lakeside attraction. For those visiting or living in Toronto, take the FREE SHUTTLE (blue bus) from Union Station to avoid parking and traffic dilemmas. It beats taking the TTC and transferring or an extra several blocks walk. Rather than pay to go through the EX (another annual attraction) we walked around the Princess Gate along the bicycle path to the Centre Entrance which prompted us to take the Free Shuttle on the way back. A word of advice about the bicycle path – watch out for cyclists! Enroute on the cyclist path is a tall Inuksuk to show you're on the correct track.
